{"Gonorrhea": {"description": "Gonorrhea is a common sexually transmitted infection (STI).", "Possible Complications": "Complications in women may include:Infections that spread to the fallopian tubes can cause scarring. This can cause problems getting pregnant at a later time., Pregnant women with severe gonorrhea may pass the disease to their baby while in the womb or during delivery. . Complications in men may include:Scarring or narrowing of the urethra (tube that carries urine out of the body), Abscess (collection of pus around the urethra), Complications in both men and women may include:, Joint infections, Heart valve infection, Infection around the brain (meningitis) . ", "Symptoms": ["Burning and pain while urinating", "Need to urinate urgently or more often ", "Discharge from the penis (white, yellow, or green in color)", "Red or swollen opening of penis (urethra)", "Tender or swollen testicles", "Sore throat (gonococcal pharyngitis)", "Vaginal discharge", "Burning and pain while urinating", "Increased urination", "Sore throat", "Painful sexual intercourse", "Severe pain in lower abdomen (if the infection spreads to the fallopian tubes and stomach area)", "Fever (if the infection spreads to the fallopian tubes and stomach area) ", "Fever", "Rash", "Arthritis-like symptoms"], "Exams and Tests": "Gonorrhea can be quickly detected by looked at a sample of discharge or tissue under the microscope. This is called a gram stain. This method is fast, but it is not the most certain.Cultures (cells that grow in a lab dish) provide proof of gonorrhea. Samples for a culture are most often taken from the cervix, vagina, urethra, anus, or throat., Rarely they taken from joint fluid or blood, Cultures can often provide an early diagnosis within 24 hours. A confirmed diagnosis is available within 72 hours. . DNA tests are useful for screening. The ligase chain reaction (LCR) testis one of the tests. DNA tests are quicker than cultures. These tests can be performed on urine samples, which are easier to collect than samples from the genital area.If you have gonorrhea, you should ask to be tested for other sexually transmitted infections, including chlamydia, syphilis, and HIV. If you are a woman age 21 or older, you should be sure you have had a recent Pap smear. ", "Treatment": "A number of different antibiotics may be used for treating this type of infection.You may receive one large dose of oral antibiotics or take a smaller dose for seven days., You may be given an antibiotic injection or shot, and then perhaps be sent home with antibiotic pills., More severe cases of PID may require you to stay in the hospital. Antibiotics are first given by IV., Never treat yourself without being seen by your doctor first. Your health care provider will determine the best treatment.. About half of the women with gonorrhea are also infected with chlamydia. Chlamydia is treated at the same time as a gonorrhea infection.You will need a follow-up visit 7 days after if your symptoms included joint pain, skin rash, or more severe pelvic or belly pain is present. Tests will be done to make sure the infection is gone.Sexual partners must be tested and treated to prevent passing the infection back and forth. You and your partner must finish all of the antibiotics. Use condoms until you both have finished taking your antibiotics.All sexual contacts of the person with gonorrhea should be contacted and tested. This helps prevent further spread of the infection.In some places you may be able to take information and medicines to your sexual partner yourself. , In other places, the health department will contact your partner.. ", "Causes": "Gonorrhea is caused by the bacteria Neisseria gonorrhoeae. Any type of sex can spread gonorrhea. You can get it through contact with the mouth, vagina, penis, or anus.The bacteria grow in warm, moist areas of the body. This can include the tube that carries urine out of the body (urethra). In women, the bacteria may be found in the reproductive tract (which includes the fallopian tubes, uterus, and cervix). The bacteria can also grow in the eyes.Health care providers are required by law to tell the State Board of Health about all cases of gonorrhea. The goal of this law is make sure the patient gets proper follow-up care. Sexual partners also need to be found and tested.You are more likely to develop this infection if:You have many sex partners., You have a partner with a past history of any STI., You do not use a condom during sex., You abuse alcohol or illegal substances.. ", "Prevention": "Avoiding sexual contact is the only sure way to prevent gonorrhea. If you and your partner do not have sex with any other persons, this can greatly reduce your chance also.Safe sex means taking steps before and during sex that can prevent you from getting an infection, or from giving one to your partner.Ash your healthcare provider if you should receive the hepatitis B vaccine-link and the HPV vaccine-link. "}, "Glucagonoma": {"description": "Glucagonoma is a very rare tumor of the islet cells of the pancreas, which leads to an excess of the hormone glucagon in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "The cancer can spread to the liver. High blood sugar level can cause metabolic problems and tissue damage.", "Symptoms": ["Glucose intolerance (body has problem breaking down sugars) ", "High blood sugar (hyperglycemia)", "Diarrhea", "Excessive thirst (due to high blood sugar)", "Frequent urination (due to high blood sugar)", "Increased appetite", "Inflamed mouth and tongue", "Nighttime (nocturnal) urination", "\r\n  Skin rash on face, abdomen, buttocks, or feet that comes and goes, and moves around\r\n  May be crusty or scaly, May be raised sores (lesions) filled with clear fluid or pus. ", "May be crusty or scaly", "May be raised sores (lesions) filled with clear fluid or pus", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:CT scan of the abdomen, Glucagon level in the blood, Glucose level in the blood . ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the tumor is the preferred treatment. The tumor does not usually respond to chemotherapy.", "Causes": "Glucagonoma is usually cancerous (malignant). The cancer tends to spread and get worse.This cancer affects the islet cells of the pancreas. As a result, the islet cells produce too much of the hormone glucagon.The cause is unknown. Genetic factors play a role in some cases. A family history of the syndrome multiple endocrine neoplasia type I (MEN I) is a risk factor."}, "Glossopharyngeal neuralgia": {"description": "Glossopharyngeal neuralgia is a condition in which there are repeated episodes of severe pain in the tongue, throat, ear, and tonsils, which can last from a few seconds to a few minutes.", "Possible Complications": "Slow pulse and fainting may occur when pain is severe.Medications used to treat this condition can have side effects.", "Symptoms": ["Back of the nose and throat (nasopharynx)", "Back of the tongue", "Ear", "Throat", "Tonsil area", "Voice box (larynx)", "Chewing", "Coughing", "Laughing", "Speaking", "Swallowing"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests will be done to identify problems, such as tumors, at the base of the skull. Tests may include:Blood tests (sugar level) to look for the causes of nerve damage, CT scan of the head, MRI of the head, X-rays of the head or neck. Sometimes the MRI may show swelling (inflammation) of the glossopharyngeal nerve.To find out whether a blood vessel is pressing on the nerve, pictures of the brain arteries may be taken using:Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA), CT angiogram, X-rays of the arteries with a dye (conventional angiography). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control pain. Over-the-counter painkillers such as aspirin and acetaminophen (Tylenol) are not very effective for relieving glossopharyngeal neuralgia.The most effective drugs are antiseizure medications. Antidepressants may help certain people.In severe cases, when pain is difficult to treat, surgery to take pressure off the glossopharyngeal nerve may be needed. This is called microvascular decompression. Or, the nerve can be cut (rhizotomy). Both surgeries are generally considered effective. If a cause of the neuralgia is found, treatment should control the underlying problem.", "Causes": "Glossopharyngeal neuralgia is believed to be caused by irritation of the ninth cranial nerve, called the glossopharyngeal nerve. Symptoms usually begin in people over age 40.In most cases, the source of irritation is never found. Some possible causes for this type of nerve pain (neuralgia) are:Blood vessels pressing on the glossopharyngeal nerve, Growths at the base of the skull pressing on the glossopharyngeal nerve, Tumors or infections of the throat and mouth pressing on the glossopharyngeal nerve. "}, "Genital injury": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Bleeding", "Bruising", "Change in shape of the affected area", "Faintness", "Foul-smelling vaginal discharge", "Object embedded in a body opening", "Groin pain or genital pain (can be extreme)", "Swelling", "Urine drainage", "Vomiting", "Urination that\u00a0is\u00a0painful or the inability to urinate", "Wound "], "Causes": "Genital injury can occur in both women and young girls. It\u00a0may be caused by placing items into the vagina. Young girls (usually less than 4 years of age) may do this during normal exploration of the body. Objects used may include toilet tissue, crayons, beads, pins, or buttons.It is important to rule out sexual abuse, rape, and assault. The health care provider should ask the girl how the object was placed there.In men and young boys, common causes of genital injury include:Having the toilet seat fall down onto the area, Getting the area caught in a pant zipper, Straddle injury - falling and landing with the legs on each side of a bar, such as a monkey bar or the middle of a bicycle . ", "description": "A genital injury is an injury to male or female sex organs, especially those outside the body. It also refers to injury in the area between the legs, called the perineum.", "Prevention": "Teach safety to young children and create a safe environment for them. Also, keep small objects out of the reach of toddlers."}, "Giant congenital nevus": {"description": "A giant congenital nevus is smaller in infants and children, but it usually continues to grow as the child grows. A giant pigmented nevus is larger than 8 inches once it stops growing.", "Possible Complications": "Having a giant nevus may lead to:Depression and other emotional problems if the nevi affect\u00a0appearance, Skin cancer (melanoma) . ", "Symptoms": ["Brown to bluish-black color", "Hair", "Regular or uneven borders", "Smaller affected\u00a0areas near the larger nevus (maybe)", "Smooth, irregular, or wart-like skin surface ", "Arms", "Legs", "Mouth", "Mucus membranes", "Palms or soles"], "Exams and Tests": "You should have all birthmarks looked at by a health care provider. A skin biopsy may be needed to check for cancer cells.An MRI of the brain might be done\u00a0if the\u00a0nevus is over the spine.\u00a0A giant nevus\u00a0on the spine may be linked to brain problems.Your doctor will measure the dark skin area every year and may take pictures to check if the spot is getting larger.", "Treatment": "You will need to have regular exams to check for skin cancers.Surgery to remove the nevus\u00a0can be done for cosmetic reasons or if your provider thinks it may become skin cancer. Skin grafting is also done when needed. Larger nevi may need to be removed in several stages.Lasers and dermabrasion (rubbing them off) can also be used to improve appearance.\u00a0These treatments may not remove the whole birthmark, so it may be harder to detect\u00a0skin cancer (melanoma). Talk to your\u00a0doctor about the pros and cons of surgery for you.Treatment may be helpful\u00a0if\u00a0the birthmark causes emotional problems because of how it looks.\u00a0", "Causes": "These\u00a0marks\u00a0are thought to be caused by problems that develop as a baby grows in the womb. In some families bathing trunk nevi may be inherited.The\u00a0condition\u00a0may occur with:Growth of fatty tissue cells , Neurofibromatosis (an inherited disease involving changes in skin pigment and other symptoms), Other nevi, Spina bifida (a birth defect in the spine). Smaller congenital pigmented or melanocytic nevi are common in children and do not cause problems most of the time. Larger or giant nevi are rare."}, "Gastroparesis": {"description": "Gastroparesis is a condition that reduces the ability of the stomach to empty its contents. It does not involve a blockage (obstruction).", "Possible Complications": "Ongoing nausea and vomiting may cause:Dehydration, Electrolyte imbalances, Malnutrition . People with diabetes may have serious complications from poor blood sugar control.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention", "Hypoglycemia (in people with diabetes)", "Nausea", "Premature abdominal fullness after meals", "Weight loss without trying", "Vomiting", "Abdominal pain "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests you may need include:Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), Gastric emptying study (using isotope labeling), Upper GI series. ", "Treatment": "People with diabetes should always control their blood sugar levels. Better control of blood sugar levels may improve symptoms of gastroparesis. Eating small meals and soft foods may also help relieve some symptoms.Medicines that may help include:Cholinergic drugs, which act on acetylcholine nerve receptors, Erythromycin, Metoclopramide, a medicine that helps empty the stomach, Serotonin antagonist drugs, which act on serotonin receptors . Other treatments may include:Botulinum toxin (Botox) injected into the outlet of the stomach (pylorus), Surgical procedure that creates an opening between the stomach and small intestine to allow food to move through the digestive tract more easily (gastroenterostomy) . ", "Causes": "The exact cause of gastroparesis is unknown. It may be caused by a disruption of nerve signals to the stomach. The condition is a common complication of diabetes. It can also follow some surgeries.Risk factors for gastroparesis include:Diabetes, Gastrectomy (surgery to remove part of the stomach), Systemic sclerosis, Use of medicine that blocks certain nerve signals (anticholinergic medicine) . "}, "Glomus jugulare tumor": {"description": "A glomus jugulare tumor is a tumor of a part of the temporal bone (which involves\u00a0the middle and inner ear structures) in the skull. This tumor can affect the ear, upper neck, base of the skull, and the surrounding blood vessels and nerves.", "Possible Complications": "The most common complications are due to nerve damage, which may be caused by the tumor itself or damage during surgery. Nerve damage can lead to:Change in voice, Difficulty swallowing, Hearing loss, Paralysis of the face. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing (dysphagia)", "Dizziness", "Hearing problems or loss", "Hearing pulsations in the ear", "Hoarseness", "Pain", "Weakness or loss of movement in the face (facial nerve palsy)"], "Exams and Tests": "Glomus jugulare tumors are diagnosed by physical examination and imaging tests, including:Cerebral angiography, CT scan, MRI scan. ", "Treatment": "Glomus jugulare tumors are rarely cancerous and do not tend to spread to other parts of the body. However, treatment may be needed to relieve symptoms. The main treatment is surgery. Surgery is complex and is usually done by a neurosurgeon, head and neck surgeon, and ear surgeon (neurotologist).In some cases, a procedure called embolization is performed before surgery to prevent the tumor from bleeding too much during surgery.After surgery, radiation therapy may be used to treat any part of the tumor that could not be removed completely.Some glomus tumors can be treated with stereotactic radiosurgery.", "Causes": "A glomus jugulare tumor grows in the temporal bone of the skull, in an area called the jugular foramen. The jugular foramen is also where the jugular vein and several important nerves exit the skull.This area contains nerve fibers, called glomus bodies, which normally respond to changes in body temperature or blood pressure.These tumors usually occur later in life, around age 60 or 70, but they can appear at any age. The cause of a glomus jugulare tumor is unknown. Usually, there are no known risk factors. Glomus tumors have been associated with changes (mutations) in a gene responsible for the enzyme succinate dehydrogenase (SDHD)."}, "Gangrene": {"description": "Gangrene is the death of tissue in part of the body.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on where in the body the gangrene is, how much gangrene there is, the cause of the gangrene, and the person's overall condition. Complications can include:Disability from amputation or removal of dead tissue, Prolonged wound healing or the need for reconstructive surgery, such as skin grafting. ", "Symptoms": ["Discoloration (blue or black if skin is affected; red or bronze if the affected area is beneath the skin)", "Foul-smelling discharge ", "Loss of feeling in the area (which may happen after severe pain in the area)", "Confusion", "Fever", "Gas in tissues beneath the skin", "General ill feeling", "Low blood pressure", "Persistent or severe pain"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may diagnose gangrene from a physical examination. In addition, the following tests and procedures may be used to diagnose gangrene:Arteriogram (special x-ray to see any blockages in the blood vessels) to help plan treatment for blood vessel disease, Blood tests (white blood cell [WBC] count may be high), CT scan to examine internal organs, Culture of the tissue or fluid from wounds to identify bacterial infection, Examining tissue under the microscope to look for cell death, X-rays . ", "Treatment": "Gangrene requires urgent evaluation and treatment. In general, dead tissue should be removed to allow healing of the surrounding living tissue and prevent further infection. Depending on the area that has the gangrene, the person's overall condition, and the cause of the gangrene, treatment may include:Amputating the body part that has gangrene , An emergency operation to find and remove dead tissue, An operation to improve blood supply to the area, Antibiotics, Repeated operations to remove dead tissue (debridement), Treatment in the intensive care unit (for severely ill patients). ", "Causes": "Gangrene happens when a body part loses its blood supply. This may happen from injury, an infection, or other causes. You have a higher risk for gangrene if you have:A serious injury, Blood vessel disease (such as arteriosclerosis, also called hardening of the arteries, in your arms or legs), Diabetes, Suppressed immune system (for example, from HIV or chemotherapy), Surgery. ", "Prevention": "Gangrene may be prevented if it is treated before the tissue damage is irreversible. Wounds should be treated properly and watched carefully for signs of infection (such as spreading redness, swelling, or drainage) or failure to heal.People with diabetes or blood vessel disease should routinely examine their feet for any signs of injury, infection, or change in skin color and seek care as needed."}, "Geographic tongue": {"description": "Geographic tongue is irregular patches on the surface of the tongue. This gives it a map-like appearance. ", "Symptoms": ["Map-like appearance to the surface of the tongue", "Patches that move from day to day", "Smooth, red patches and sores (lesions) on the tongue", "Soreness and burning pain (in some cases)"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will diagnose this condition by looking at your tongue. Most of the time, tests are not needed.", "Causes": "The exact cause of geographic tongue is unknown. It may be caused by a lack of vitamin B. It also may be due to irritation from hot or spicy foods, or alcohol. The condition appears to be less common in smokers.The change in pattern on the surface of the tongue occurs when there is a loss of the tiny, finger-like projections, called papillae, on the tongue. These areas look flat as a result. The appearance of the tongue may change very quickly. The flat-looking areas may remain for more than a month.", "Prevention": "Avoid irritating your tongue with hot or spicy food or alcohol if you are prone to this condition.", "Treatment": "No treatment is needed. Antihistamine gel or steroid mouth rinses may help ease discomfort."}, "Gasoline poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling", "Pain", "Vision loss", "Abdominal pain", "Blood stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly with blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Feeling of being drunk (euphoria)", "Headache", "Loss of alertness", "Staggering", "Seizures", "Weakness", "Burns", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Grass allergy": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Headache", "Itchy, watery eyes", "Runny nose", "Sneezing", "Stuffy nose"], "description": "See also:"}, "Ganglioneuroma": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Chest pain", "Compression of the windpipe (trachea) ", "Abdominal pain", "Bloating ", "Compression of the spinal cord, which leads to pain and loss of strength or feeling in the legs, arms, or both", "Spine deformity ", "Diarrhea", "Enlarged clitoris (women)", "High blood pressure", "Increased body hair", "Sweating "], "Possible Complications": "If the tumor has been present for a long time and has pressed on the spinal cord or caused other symptoms, surgery to remove the tumor may not reverse the damage.Compression of the spinal cord may result in loss of movement (paralysis), especially if the cause is not detected promptly.Surgery to remove the tumor may also lead to complications in some cases. In rare cases, problems due to compression may occur even after the tumor is removed.", "description": "Ganglioneuroma is a tumor of the peripheral nervous system.", "Causes": "Ganglioneuromas are rare tumors that most\u00a0often start in autonomic nerve cells, which may be in any part of the body. The tumors are usually noncancerous (benign).Ganglioneuromas usually occur in people ages 10 to 40. They grow slowly, and may release certain chemicals or hormones.There are no known risk factors. However, the tumors may be associated with some genetic problems, such as neurofibromatosis type 1.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves surgery to remove the tumor (if it is causing symptoms)."}, "Gigantism": {"description": "Gigantism is abnormal growth due to an excess of growth hormone during childhood.", "Possible Complications": "Surgery may lead to low levels of other pituitary hormones, which can cause:Adrenal insufficiency, Diabetes insipidus (rarely), Hypogonadism, Hypothyroidism. ", "Symptoms": ["Delayed puberty", "Double vision or difficulty with side (peripheral) vision", "Frontal bossing and a prominent jaw", "Gaps between the teeth", "Headache", "Increased sweating", "Irregular periods (menstruation)", "Large hands and feet with thick fingers and toes", "Release of breast milk", "Sleep problems", "Thickening of the facial features", "Weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about the child's symptoms.Laboratory tests that may be ordered include:Cortisol, Estradiol (girls), Growth hormone suppression test, Prolactin, Increased growth factor-I, Testosterone (boys), Thyroid hormone . Imaging tests, such as CT or MRI scan of the head, also may be ordered to check for a pituitary tumor. ", "Treatment": "For pituitary tumors with well-defined borders, surgery can cure many cases.When surgery cannot completely remove the tumor, medicines are used to block or reduce growth hormone release.", "Causes": "The most common cause of too much growth hormone release is a noncancerous (benign) tumor of the pituitary gland. Other causes include:Carney complex, McCune-Albright syndrome (MAS), Multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 (MEN-1), Neurofibromatosis. If excess growth hormone occurs after normal bone growth has stopped, the condition is known as acromegaly.Gigantism is very rare."}, "Gingivostomatitis": {"description": "Gingivostomatitis is an infection of the mouth and gums that leads to swelling and sores. It may be due to a virus or bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Gingivostomatitis may disguise other, more serious mouth ulcers.", "Symptoms": ["Bad breath", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Sores on the inside of the cheeks or gums", "Very sore mouth with no desire to eat"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will check your mouth for small ulcers. These sores are similar to mouth ulcers caused by other conditions. Cough, fever, or muscle aches may indicate other conditions.Most of the time, no special tests are needed to diagnose gingivostomatitis. However, the doctor may take a small piece of tissue from the sore to check for a viral or bacterial infection. This is called a culture. A biopsy may be done to rule out other types of mouth ulcers.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms.Things you can do at home include:Practice good oral hygiene. Brush your gums well to reduce the risk of getting another infection., Use mouth rinses that reduce pain if your doctor recommends them., Rinse your mouth with salt water (one-half teaspoon of salt in 1 cup of water) or mouthwashes with hydrogen peroxide or Xylocaine to ease discomfort., Eat a healthy diet. Soft, bland (non-spicy) foods may reduce discomfort during eating.\r\n  . You may need to take antibiotics. You may need to have the infected tissue removed by the dentist (called debridement).", "Causes": "Gingivostomatitis is common among children. It may occur after infection with the herpes simplex virus type 1 (HSV-1), which also causes cold sores.The condition may also occur after infection with a coxsackie virus. \r\n It may occur in people with poor oral hygiene."}, "Gastrointestinal fistula": {"description": "A gastrointestinal fistula is an abnormal opening in the stomach or intestines that allows the contents to leak. ", "Possible Complications": "Fistulas may result in malnutrition and dehydration, depending on their location in the intestine. They may also cause skin problems and infection.", "Symptoms": ["Entero-enteral fistulas may have no symptoms.", "Enterocutaneous fistulas cause intestinal contents to leak through an opening in the skin."], "Exams and Tests": "Barium swallow to look for a gastrointestinal fistula, Barium enema to look for a fistula involving the colon, CT scan of the abdomen to look for fistulas between loops of the intestines or areas of infection, Fistulogram, in which contrast dye is injected into the opening of the skin of an enterocutaneous fistula and x-rays are taken. ", "Treatment": "Treatments may include:Antibiotics, Immune suppressing medicines if the fistula is a result of Crohn's disease, Surgery to remove the fistula and part of the intestines if the fistula is not healing, Nutrition through a vein while the fistula heals (in some cases) . Some fistulas close on their own after a few weeks to months. ", "Causes": "Most gastrointestinal fistulas occur after surgery. Other causes include:Blockage in the gastrointestinal tract, Infection, Inflammatory bowel disease (most often Crohn's disease), Radiation to the abdomen (most often given as part of cancer treatment), Injury such as deep wounds from stabbing or gunshot. "}, "Grief": {"description": "Grief is a reaction to a major loss of someone or something. It is most often an unhappy and painful emotion.", "Possible Complications": "Call your health care provider if you have any of the following:Are not able to deal with grief, Are using excessive amounts of drugs or alcohol, Become very depressed, Long-term depression that interferes with your daily life. ", "Symptoms": ["Denial, disbelief, numbness", "Anger, blaming others", "Bargaining (for instance \"If I am cured of this cancer, I will never smoke again.\")", "Depressed mood, sadness, and crying", "Acceptance, coming to terms"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms, including your sleep and appetite. Symptoms that last for a while may lead to clinical depression.", "Treatment": "Family and friends can offer emotional support during the grieving process. Sometimes outside factors can affect the normal grieving process, and people might need help from:Clergy, Mental health specialists, Social workers, Support groups. The acute phase of grief usually lasts up to 2 months. Milder symptoms may last for a year or longer. Psychological counseling may help a person who is unable to face the loss (absent grief reaction), or who has depression with grieving.", "Causes": "Grief may be triggered by the death of a loved one. People also can experience grief if they have an illness for which there is no cure, or a chronic condition that affects their quality of life. The end of a significant relationship may also cause grieving.Everyone feels grief in their own way. But there are common stages to the process of mourning. It starts with recognizing a loss and continues until a person eventually accepts that loss. People's responses to grief will be different, depending on the circumstances of the death. For example, if the person who died had a chronic illness, the death may have been expected. The end of the person's suffering might even have come as a relief. If the death was accidental or violent, coming to a stage of acceptance might take longer.", "Prevention": "Grief should not be prevented because it is a healthy response to loss. Instead, it should be respected. Those who are grieving should have support to help them through the process."}, "Generalized tonic-clonic seizure": {"Symptoms": ["Biting the cheek or tongue", "Clenched teeth or jaw", "Loss of urine or stool control (incontinence)", "Stopped breathing or difficulty breathing", "Blue skin color ", "Confusion", "Drowsiness or sleepiness that lasts for 1 hour or longer", "Loss of memory (amnesia) about the seizure episode", "Headache", "Weakness of one side of the body for a few minutes to a few hours following seizure (called Todd paralysis)"], "Exams and Tests": "\r\n \r\nThe doctor will perform a physical exam. This will include a detailed look at the brain and nervous system.An EEG (electroencephalogram)\u00a0will be done to check the electrical activity in the brain. People with seizures often have abnormal electrical activity seen on this test. In some cases, the test shows the area in the brain where the seizures start. The brain may appear normal after a seizure or between seizures.Blood tests may also be ordered to check for other health problems that may be causing the seizures.Head CT or MRI scan may be done to find the cause and location of the problem in the brain.", "description": "Generalized tonic-clonic seizure is\u00a0one type of\u00a0seizure that involves the entire body. It is also called grand mal seizure. The terms seizure, convulsion, or epilepsy are most often associated with generalized tonic-clonic seizures.", "Causes": "Generalized tonic-clonic seizures may occur in people of any age. They\u00a0can occur once (single episode).\u00a0Or they can occur as part of a repeated, chronic\u00a0illness (epilepsy). Some seizures are due to\u00a0psychological problems (psychogenic).", "Treatment": "Treatment for tonic-clonic seizures includes medications, changes in lifestyle for adults and children, such as activity and diet, and sometimes surgery. Your doctor can tell you more about these options."}, "Grass and weed killer poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Anxiety", "Breathing difficulty", "Coma", "Cyanosis (blue lips or fingernails -- rare)", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Irritation of mouth and throat", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea", "Tearing, increased", "Vomiting (may vomit blood)", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "General paresis": {"description": "General paresis is a\u00a0problem with\u00a0mental function due to\u00a0damage to the brain from untreated syphilis.", "Possible Complications": "Inability to care for yourself, Inability to communicate or interact with others, Injury due to seizures or falls. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased language ability (aphasia)", "Decreased motivation", "Impaired judgment", "Loss of ability to calculate", "Loss of long-term memory (long-past events)", "Loss of short-term memory (recent events)", "Muscle weakness (difficulty using legs, arms, or other parts of the body)", "Personality changes, such as\u00a0delusions, hallucinations, irritability, inappropriate behavior", "Seizures"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history. During the exam, the doctor may check your nervous system function. For example, your muscles may be tested for weakness. Or you may be asked to stand while your eyes are closed.Blood and urine tests may be ordered to detect syphilis in the body.Tests of the nervous system may include:Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), Head CT scan and MRI, Nerve conduction tests. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to cure the infection and slow the disorder from getting worse. The doctor will prescribe penicillin or other antibiotics to treat the infection. Treatment will likely continue until the infection has completely cleared.Treating the infection will reduce new nerve damage. But it will not cure damage that has already occurred.Treatment of symptoms is needed for existing nervous system damage. \r\n", "Causes": "General paresis is one form of neurosyphilis, an infection of the brain or spinal cord. It usually occurs in persons who have had untreated syphilis for many years. Syphilis is bacterial infection that is most often spread through sexual or nonsexual contact. Today, neurosyphilis is very rare. \r\n Syphilis infection can appear in many different ways, and damages many different nerves of the brain. This damage can cause:Abnormal mental function including hallucinations and false ideas (delusions), Brief, sharp, \"lightning\" pains that occur with tabes dorsalis, Decreased mental function, Eye changes and abnormal pupil response, Mood changes, Overactive reflexes, Personality changes, Speech changes. General paresis usually begins about 15\u00a0to 20 years after the syphilis infection. Risks include syphilis infection and infection with other sexually transmitted diseases, such as gonorrhea (which may hide symptoms of syphilis infection).", "Prevention": "Treating primary syphilis and secondary syphilis infections will prevent general paresis.Practicing safer sex, such as limiting partners and using protection, may reduce the risk of getting infected with syphilis. Avoid direct skin contact with persons who have secondary syphilis."}, "Glanzmann's disease": {"description": "Glanzmann's disease is a rare disorder of blood platelets, which results in easy bruising and nosebleeds.", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding, Iron deficiency anemia in menstruating women. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding during and after surgery", "Bleeding gums", "Easy bruising", "Heavy menstrual bleeding", "Nosebleeds (epistaxis)", "Prolonged bleeding with minor injuries"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be used to diagnose this condition:Complete blood count (CBC), Bleeding time, Platelet aggregation tests, Prothrombin time (PT) and partial thromboplastin time (PTT). Other tests may be needed, including the testing of relatives.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for this disorder. Platelet transfusions may be given to patients who are having severe bleeding.", "Causes": "Glanzmann's disease is caused by the lack of a protein that is normally on the surface of platelets. This substanceis needed for the cells to clump together (aggregate) normally.The condition is congenital, which means it is present from birth. There are several genetic abnormalities that can cause the condition.", "Prevention": "A blood test can detect the gene responsible for the platelet defect. You may wish to seek genetic counseling if you have a family history of this problem and are considering having children. "}, "Glomerulonephritis": {"description": "Glomerulonephritis is a type of kidney disease in which the part of your kidneys that helps filter waste and fluids from the blood is damaged.", "Possible Complications": "Acute nephritic syndrome, Blood electrolyte problems, Chronic kidney disease, Chronic or repeated urinary tract infection, End-stage kidney disease, Fluid overload -- congestive heart failure, pulmonary edema, Hyperkalemia, Hypertension, Increased susceptibility to other infections, Malignant hypertension, Nephrotic syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine (dark, rust-colored, or brown urine)", "Foamy urine (due to excess protein in the urine)", "Swelling (edema) of the face, eyes, ankles, feet, legs, or abdomen", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the vomit or stools", "Cough and shortness of breath", "Diarrhea", "Excessive urination", "Fever", "General ill feeling, fatigue, and loss of appetite", "Joint or muscle aches", "Nosebleed"], "Exams and Tests": "Because symptoms may develop slowly, the disorder may be discovered when you have an abnormal urinalysis during a routine physical or examination for another condition.Signs of glomerulonephritis can include:Anemia, High blood pressure, Signs of reduced kidney function. A kidney biopsy confirms the diagnosis.Later, signs of chronic kidney disease may be seen, including:Nerve inflammation (polyneuropathy), Signs of fluid overload, including abnormal heart and lung sounds, Swelling (edema). Imaging tests that may be done include:Abdominal CT scan, Kidney ultrasound, Chest x-ray, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP). Urinalysis and other urine tests include:Creatinine clearance, Examination of the urine under a microscope, Urine for total protein, Uric acid in the urine, Urine concentration test, Urine creatinine, Urine protein, Urine RBC, Urine specific gravity, Urine osmolality. This disease may also cause abnormal results on the following blood tests:Albumin, Anti-glomerular basement membrane antibody test, Anti-neutrophil cytoplasmic antibodies (ANCAs), Anti-nuclear antibodies, BUN and creatinine, Complement levels. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the disorder, and the type and severity of symptoms. High blood pressure may be hard to control. Controlling high blood pressure is usually the most important part of treatment.Medicines that may be prescribed include:Blood pressure medications to control high blood pressure, most commonly angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors and angiotensin receptor blockers, Corticosteroids, Medications that suppress the immune system. A procedure called plasmapheresis may sometimes be used for glomerulonephritis caused by immune problems. The fluid part of the blood that contains antibodies is removed and replaced with intravenous fluids or donated plasma (that does not contain antibodies). Removing antibodies may reduce inflammation in the kidney tissues.You may need to limit salt, fluids, protein, and other substances.Persons with this condition should be closely watched for signs of kidney failure. Dialysis or a kidney transplant may eventually be needed.", "Causes": "Glomerulonephritis may be caused by problems with the body's immune system. Often, the exact cause of glomerulonephritis is unknown.Damage to the glomeruli causes blood and protein to be lost in the urine.The condition may develop quickly, and kidney function is lost within weeks or months (called rapidly progressive glomerulonephritis).A quarter of people with chronic glomerulonephritis have no history of kidney disease.The following may increase your risk of this condition:Blood or lymphatic system disorders, Exposure to hydrocarbon solvents, History of cancer, Infections such as strep infections, viruses, heart infections, or abscesses. Many conditions cause or increase the risk for glomerulonephritis, including:Amyloidosis, Anti-glomerular basement membrane antibody disease, Blood vessel diseases, such as vasculitis or polyarteritis, Focal segmental glomerulosclerosis, Goodpasture syndrome, Heavy use of pain relievers, especially NSAIDs, Henoch-Schonlein purpura, IgA nephropathy, Lupus nephritis, Membranoproliferative GN. ", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent most cases of glomerulonephritis. Some cases may be prevented by avoiding or limiting exposure to organic solvents, mercury, and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs)."}, "Gonococcal Arthritis": {"description": "Gonococcal arthritis is inflammation of a joint due to a gonorrhea infection.", "Possible Complications": "Untreated, this condition may lead to persistent joint pain.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Lower abdominal pain", "Joint pain for 1 to 4 days", "Pain in the hands or wrists due to tendon inflammation", "Pain or burning during urination", "Single joint pain", "Skin rash (sores are slightly raised, pink to red, and may later contain pus or appear purple)"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood cultures should be checked in all cases of possible gonococcal arthritis.Tests will be done to check for a gonorrhea infection. This may involve taking samples of tissue, stool, joint fluids, or other body material and sending them to a lab for examination under a microscope. Examples of such tests include:Cervical gram stain, Culture of joint aspirate, Joint fluid gram stain, Throat culture, Urine test for gonorrhea. ", "Treatment": "The gonorrhea infection must be treated.There are two aspects of treating a sexually transmitted disease, especially one as easily spread as gonorrhea. The first is to cure the infected person. The second is to locate, test, and treat all sexual contacts of the infected person to prevent further spread of the disease.Some locations allow you to take counseling information and treatment to your partner(s) yourself. In other locations, the health department will contact your partner(s).A standardized treatment routine is recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC). Your health care provider will determine the best and most up-to-date treatment. A follow-up visit 7 days after treatment is important, if the infection was complicated, to recheck blood tests and confirm that the infection was cured.", "Causes": "Gonococcal arthritis is an infection of a joint. It occurs in people who have gonorrhea caused by the bacteria Neisseria gonorrhoeae.\u00a0Gonococcal arthritis\u00a0affects women more often than men, and it is most common among sexually active adolescent girls.Two forms of gonococcal arthritis exist:One\u00a0form involves skin rashes and many joints, usually large joints such as the knee, wrist, and ankle., The second, less common form involves the spread of the bacteria through the blood (disseminated gonococcemia), which leads to infection of a joint, sometimes more than one joint.. ", "Prevention": "Not having sexual intercourse (abstinence) is the only sure method of preventing gonorrhea. A monogamous sexual relationship with a person who you know does not have any sexually transmitted disease (STD) can reduce your risk. Monogamous means you and your partner do not have sex with any other people.You can greatly lower your risk of infection with an STD by using a condom every time you have sex. Condoms are available for both men and women, but are most commonly worn by the man. A condom must be used properly every time.Treating all sexual partners is essential to prevent re-infection."}, "Group B streptococcal septicemia of the newborn": {"description": "See also: Neonatal sepsis", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) -- a serious disorder in which the proteins that control blood clotting are abnormally active, Hypoglycemia -- low blood sugar, Meningitis -- swelling (inflammation) of the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord caused by infection, Respiratory failure -- breathing stops. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxious or stressed appearance", "Blue appearance (cyanosis)", "Breathing difficulties such as: \r\n\r\nFlaring of the nostrils, Grunting noises, Rapid breathing, Short periods without breathing. ", "Flaring of the nostrils", "Grunting noises", "Rapid breathing", "Short periods without breathing", "Irregular or abnormal heart rate - may be fast or very slow", "Lethargy", "Pale appearance (pallor) with cold skin", "Poor feeding", "Unstable body temperature (low or high)"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose GBS septicemia, GBS bacteria must be found in a sample of blood (blood culture) taken from a sick newborn.Other tests that may be done include:Blood clotting tests - prothrombin time (PT) and partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Blood gases (to see if the baby needs help with breathing), Complete blood count, CSF culture (to check for meningitis), Urine culture, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve one or more of the following:Antibiotics given through a vein, Breathing help (respiratory support), Fluids given through a vein, Medicines to reverse shock, Medicines or procedures to correct blood clotting problems, Oxygen therapy. A therapy called extracorporeal membrane oxygenation (ECMO) may be used in very severe cases.", "Causes": "Septicemia is an infection in the bloodstream that may travel to different body organs. Group B streptococcal septicemia is caused by the bacterium Streptococcus agalactiae, which is commonly called \"group B strep\" or GBS. A newborn with septicemia is very sick. GBS is commonly found in adults and older children, where it does not usually cause infection. There are two ways in which it may be passed to a newborn baby:The infant can become infected as he or she passes through the birth canal. In this case, babies become ill between birth and 6 days of life (most often in the first 24 hours). This is called \"early-onset\" GBS disease., The infant may also become infected after delivery by coming into contact with people who carry the GBS germ. In this case symptoms appear later, when the baby is 7 days to 3 months or more old. This is called \"late-onset\" GBS disease.. GBS now occurs less often, because now there are methods to screen and treat pregnant women at risk.The following increase an infant's risk for group B streptococcal septicemia:Being born more than 3 weeks before the due date (prematurity), especially if the mother goes into labor early (preterm labor), Mother who has already given birth to a baby with GBS sepsis, Mother who has a fever (over 100.4 degrees F) during labor, Mother who has group B streptococcus in her gastrointestinal, reproductive, or urinary tract, Rupture of membranes (\"water breaks\") more than 18 hours before the baby is delivered, Use of intrauterine fetal monitoring (\"scalp lead\") during labor. ", "Prevention": "To help reduce the risk of Group B streptococcal septicemia, the American Academy of Pediatrics, American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, and U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommend that pregnant women\u00a0get tested for group B streptococcus at 35 - 37 weeks into their pregnancy. If the bacteria are detected, women are given antibiotics through a vein during labor. If the mother goes into premature labor before 35 weeks, she should be tested for GBS.Newborns who are at high risk are tested for GBS infection. They may receive antibiotics through a vein during the first 48 hours of life until blood culture results are available.In all cases, proper hand washing by nursery caretakers, visitors, and parents can help prevent the spread of the bacteria after the infant is born.An early diagnosis can help decrease the risk of some complications."}, "Gallstones": {"description": "Gallstones are hard deposits that form inside the gallbladder. Gallstones may be as small as a grain of sand or as large as a golf ball.", "Possible Complications": "Blockage by gallstones may cause swelling or infection in the:Gallbladder (cholecystitis), Tube that carries bile from the liver to the gallbladder and intestines (cholangitis), Pancreas (pancreatitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the right upper or middle upper abdomen for at least 30 minutes. The pain may be constant or cramping. It can feel sharp or dull.", "Fever", "Yellowing of skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice) ", "Clay-colored stools", "Nausea and vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests used to detect gallstones or gallbladder inflammation include:Ultrasound, abdomen, CT scan, abdomen\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Gallbladder radionuclide scan, Endoscopic ultrasound, Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTCA) . Your doctor may order the following blood tests:Bilirubin, Liver function tests, Pancreatic enzymes . ", "Treatment": "SURGERYMost of the time, surgery is not needed unless symptoms begin. However, people planning weight loss surgery may need to have gallstones removed before undergoing the procedure. In general, patients who have symptoms will need surgery right away or soon after the stone is found.A technique called laparoscopic cholecystectomy is most commonly used. This procedure uses small surgical cuts, which allow for a faster recovery. Patients can often go home from the hospital within 1 day of surgery., In the past, open cholecystectomy (gallbladder removal) was most often done. However, this technique is less common now.. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and a procedure called a sphincterotomy may be done to find or treat gallstones in the common bile duct.MEDICINESMedicines may be given in pill form to dissolve cholesterol gallstones. However, these drugs may take 2 years or longer to work, and the stones may return after treatment ends.Rarely, chemicals are passed into the gallbladder through a catheter. The chemical rapidly dissolves cholesterol stones. This treatment is hard to perform, so it is not done very often. The chemicals used can be toxic, and the gallstones may return.LITHOTRIPSYShock wave lithotripsy (ESWL) of the gallbladder has also been used for people who cannot have surgery. This treatment is not used as often as it once was because gallstones often come back. ", "Causes": "The cause of gallstones varies. There are two main types of gallstones:Stones made of cholesterol. This is the most common type. Cholesterol gallstones are not related to cholesterol levels in the blood., Stones made of bilirubin. These are called pigment stones. They occur when red blood cells are destroyed and too much bilirubin is in the bile. . Gallstones are more common in women, Native Americans, Hispanics, people over age 40, and people who are overweight. Gallstones may also run in families.The following factors also make you more likely to develop gallstones:Bone marrow or solid organ transplant, Diabetes, Failure of the gallbladder to empty bile properly (this is more likely to happen during pregnancy), Liver cirrhosis\u00a0and biliary tract infections (pigmented stones), Medical conditions that cause too many red blood cells to be destroyed, Rapid weight loss from eating a very low-calorie diet, or after weight loss surgery, Receiving nutrition through a vein for a long period of time (intravenous feedings), Taking birth control pills. ", "Prevention": "In most people, gallstones cannot be prevented. In people who are obese, avoiding rapid weight loss could prevent gallstones."}, "Glaucoma": {"description": "Most often, optic nerve damage is caused by increased pressure in the eye. This is called intraocular pressure.", "Symptoms": ["Most people have no symptoms", "Once vision loss occurs, the damage is already severe", "Slow loss of side (peripheral) vision (also called tunnel vision)", "Advanced glaucoma can lead to blindness ", "Sudden, severe pain in one eye", "Decreased or cloudy vision, often called \"steamy\" vision", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rainbow-like halos around lights", "Red eye", "Eye feels swollen ", "Cloudiness of the front of the eye", "Enlargement of one eye or both eyes", "Red eye", "Sensitivity to light", "Tearing ", "Symptoms are usually related to the underlying problem causing the glaucoma", "Depending on the cause, symptoms may either be like open-angle glaucoma or angle-closure glaucoma "], "Exams and Tests": "The only way to diagnose glaucoma is by having a complete eye exam. Usually you'll be given eye drops to widen (dilate) your pupil., When your pupil is dilated, your eye doctor will look at the inside of your eye and the optic nerve., You may be given a test to check your eye pressure. This is called tonometry. . Eye pressure is different at different times of the day. Eye pressure can even be normal in some people with glaucoma. So your doctor will need to run other tests to confirm glaucoma. They may include:Using a special lens to look at the angle of the eye (gonioscopy), Photographs or laser scanning images of the inside of your eye (optic nerve imaging), Checking your retina. The retina is the light sensitive tissue at the back of your eye., Checking how your pupil responds to light (pupillary reflex response), 3-D view of your eye (slit lamp examination), Testing the clearness of your vision (visual acuity), Testing your field of vision (visual field measurement) . ", "Causes": "Glaucoma is the second most common cause of blindness in the U.S. There are four major types of glaucoma:Open-angle glaucoma, Angle-closure glaucoma, also called closed-angle glaucoma, Congenital glaucoma, Secondary glaucoma . The front part of the eye is filled with a clear fluid called aqueous humor. This fluid is made in an area behind the colored part of the eye (iris). It leaves the eye through channels where the iris and cornea meet. This area is called the anterior chamber angle, or the angle. The cornea is the clear covering on the front of the eye that covers the iris, pupil, and angle.Anything that slows or blocks the flow of this fluid will cause pressure to build up in the eye. In open-angle glaucoma, the increase in pressure is often small and slow., In closed-angle, the increase is often high and sudden., Either type can damage the optic nerve. . Open-angle glaucoma is the most common type of glaucoma.The cause is unknown. The increase in eye pressure happens slowly over time. You can't feel it., The increased pressure pushes on the optic nerve. Damage to the optic nerve causes blind spots in your vision., Open-angle glaucoma tends to run in families. Your risk is higher if you have a parent or grandparent with open-angle glaucoma. People of African descent are also at higher risk for this disease. . Closed-angle glaucoma occurs when the fluid is suddenly blocked and can't flow out of the eye. This causes a quick, severe rise in eye pressure.The sudden increase in pressure causes eye pain., Closed-angle glaucoma is an emergency., If you have had acute glaucoma in one eye, you are at risk for it in the second eye. Your doctor is likely to treat your second eye to try prevent another attack. . Secondary glaucoma occurs due to a known cause. Both open- and closed-angle glaucoma can be secondary when caused by something known. Causes include:Drugs such as corticosteroids, Eye drops that dilate your eyes, Eye diseases such as uveitis (an infection of the middle layer of the eye), Diseases such as diabetes, Eye injury . Congenital glaucoma occurs in babies. It often runs in families., It is present at birth., It is caused when the eye does not\u00a0develop normally. . ", "Prevention": "You can't prevent open-angle glaucoma. Most people have no symptoms. But you can help prevent vision loss.A complete eye exam can help find open-angle glaucoma early, when it is easier to treat. , All adults should have a complete eye exam by the age of 40., If you are at risk for glaucoma, you should have a complete eye exam sooner than age 40. , You should have regular eye exams as recommended by your doctor.. If you are at risk for closed-angle glaucoma, your doctor may recommend treatment before you have an attack to help prevent eye damage and vision loss. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce your eye pressure. Treatment depends on the type of glaucoma that you have.OPEN-ANGLE GLAUCOMAIf you have open-angle glaucoma, you will probably be given eye drops. , You may need more than one type. Most people can be treated with eye drops. , Most of the eye drops used today have fewer side effects than those used in the past. , You also may be given pills to lower pressure in the eye.. If drops alone don't work, you may need other treatment:Laser treatment uses a painless laser to open the channels where fluid flows out. , If drops and laser treatment don't work, you may need surgery. You will be put asleep with general anesthesia. The doctor will use a small knife to cut open a new channel so fluid can escape. This will help lower your pressure.. ACUTE ANGLE GLAUCOMAAn acute angle-closure attack is a medical emergency. You can become blind in a few days if you aren't treated. You may be given drops, pills, and medicine given through a vein (by IV) to lower your eye pressure. , Some people also need an emergency operation, called an iridotomy. The doctor uses a laser to open a new channel in the iris. Sometimes this is done with surgery. The new channel relieves the attack and will prevent another attack. , To help prevent an attack in the other eye, the procedure will often be performed on the other eye. This may be done even if it has never had an attack.. CONGENTIAL GLAUCOMACongenital glaucoma is almost always treated with surgery. , This is done using general anesthesia. This means the child is asleep and feels no pain. . SECONDARY GLAUCOMAIf you have secondary glaucoma, treating the cause may help your symptoms go away. Other treatments also may be needed. "}, "Gestational diabetes": {"description": "Gestational diabetes is high blood sugar (diabetes) that starts or is first diagnosed during pregnancy.", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Fatigue", "Frequent infections, including those of the bladder, vagina, and skin", "Increased thirst", "Increased urination", "Nausea and vomiting", "Weight loss despite increased appetite"], "Exams and Tests": "Gestational diabetes most often starts halfway through the pregnancy. All pregnant women should receive an oral glucose tolerance test between the 24th and 28th week of pregnancy to look for the condition. Women who have risk factors for gestational diabetes may have this test earlier in the pregnancy.Once you are diagnosed with gestational diabetes, you can see how well you are doing by testing your glucose level at home. The most common way involves pricking your finger and putting a drop of your blood on a machine that will give you a glucose reading.", "Causes": "Pregnancy hormones can block insulin from doing its job. When this happens, glucose levels may increase in a pregnant woman's blood.You are at greater risk for gestational diabetes if you:Are older than 25 when you are pregnant, Come from a higher risk ethnic group, such as Hispanic American, African American, Native American, Southeast Asian, or Pacific Islander, Have a family history of diabetes, Gave birth to a baby that weighed more than 9 pounds or had a birth defect, Have high blood pressure, Have too much amniotic fluid, Have had an unexplained miscarriage or stillbirth, Were overweight before your pregnancy, Gain too much weight during your pregnancy, Have polycystic ovarian syndrome . ", "Prevention": "Getting prenatal care early and having regular checkups helps improve your health and the health of your baby. Having prenatal screening at 24 - 28 weeks of pregnancy will help detect gestational diabetes early.If you are overweight, getting your weight within the normal body mass index (BMI) range will decrease your risk of gestational diabetes.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to keep blood sugar (glucose) levels within normal limits during the pregnancy, and to make sure that the growing baby is healthy.WATCHING YOUR BABYYour health care provider should closely check both you and your baby throughout the pregnancy. Fetal monitoring will check the size and health of the fetus.A nonstress test is a very simple, painless test for you and your baby. A machine that hears and displays your baby's heartbeat (electronic fetal monitor) is placed on your abdomen., Your health care provider can compare the pattern of your baby's heartbeat to movements and find out whether the baby is doing well. . DIET AND EXERCISEThe best way to improve your diet is by eating a variety of healthy foods. You should learn how to read food labels, and check them when making food decisions. Talk to your health care provider if you are a vegetarian or on another special diet.In general, when you have gestational diabetes your diet should: Be moderate in fat and protein, Provide your carbohydrates through foods that include fruits, vegetables, and complex carbohydrates (such as bread, cereal, pasta, and rice), Be low in foods that contain a lot of sugar, such as soft drinks, fruit juices, and pastries . If managing your diet does not control blood sugar (glucose) levels, you may be prescribed diabetes medicine by mouth or insulin therapy. Most women who develop gestational diabetes will not need diabetes medicines or insulin, but some will."}, "Glomus tympanum tumor": {"description": "A glomus tympanum tumor is a tumor of the middle ear and bone behind the ear (mastoid).", "Possible Complications": "The most common complication is hearing loss.Nerve damage, which may be caused by the tumor itself or damage during surgery, rarely occurs. Nerve damage can lead to facial paralysis.", "Symptoms": ["Hearing problems or loss", "Ringing in the ear (pulsatile tinnitus)", "Weakness or loss of movement in the face (facial nerve palsy)"], "Exams and Tests": "Glomus tympanum tumors are diagnosed by a physical examination. They may be seen in the ear or behind the eardrum.Diagnosis also involves scans, including:CT scan, MRI scan. ", "Treatment": "Glomus tympanum tumors are rarely cancerous and do not tend to spread to other parts of the body. However, treatment may be needed to relieve symptoms.", "Causes": "A glomus tympanum tumor grows in the temporal bone of the skull, behind the eardrum (tympanic membrane).This area contains nerve fibers (glomus bodies) that normally respond to changes in body temperature or blood pressure.These tumors usually occur late in life, around age 60 or 70, but they can appear at any age.The cause of a glomus tympanum tumor is unknown. Usually, there are no known risk factors. Glomus tumors have been associated with changes (mutations) in a gene responsible for the enzyme succinate dehydrogenase (SDHD)."}, "Gastroesophageal reflux disease": {"description": "Gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD) is a condition in which the stomach contents leak backwards from the stomach into the esophagus (the tube from the mouth to the stomach). This can irritate the esophagus and cause heartburn and other symptoms.", "Possible Complications": "Worsening of asthma, A change in the lining of the esophagus that can increase the risk of cancer (Barrett's esophagus), Bronchospasm (irritation and spasm of the airways due to acid), Chronic cough or hoarseness, Dental problems, Ulcer in the esophagus, Stricture (a narrowing of the esophagus due to scarring) . ", "Symptoms": ["Feeling that food is stuck behind the breastbone", "Heartburn or a burning pain in the chest ", "Nausea after eating", "Bringing food back up (regurgitation)", "Cough or wheezing", "Difficulty swallowing ", "Hiccups", "Hoarseness or change in voice", "Sore throat"], "Exams and Tests": "You may not need any tests if your symptoms are mild.If your symptoms are severe or they come back after you have been treated, your doctor may perform a test called an upper endoscopy (EGD)This is a test to examine the lining of the esophagus (the tube that connects your throat to your stomach), stomach, and first part of the small intestine., It is done with a small camera (flexible endoscope) that is inserted down the throat. . You may also need one or more of the following tests:A test that measures how often stomach acid enters the tube that leads from the mouth to the stomach (called the esophagus), A test to measure the pressure inside the lower part of the esophagus (esophageal manometry) . A positive stool occult blood test may diagnose bleeding that is coming from the irritation in the esophagus, stomach, or intestines.", "Treatment": "You can make many lifestyle changes to help treat your symptoms.Other tips include:If you are overweight or obese, in many cases, losing weight can help., Avoid drugs such as aspirin, ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin), or naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn). Take acetaminophen (Tylenol) to relieve pain. , Take all of your medicines with plenty of water. When your doctor gives you a new medicine, ask whether it will make your heartburn worse.. You may use over-the-counter antacids after meals and at bedtime, although the relief may not last very long. Common side effects of antacids include diarrhea or constipation.Other over-the-counter and prescription drugs can treat GERD. They work more slowly than antacids, but give you longer relief. Your pharmacist, doctor, or nurse can tell you how to take these drugs.Proton pump inhibitors (PPIs) decrease the amount of acid produced in your stomach, H2 blockers also lower the amount of acid released in the stomach . Anti-reflux surgery may be an option for patients whose symptoms do not go away with lifestyle changes and drugs. Heartburn and other symptoms should improve after surgery. But you may still need to take drugs for your heartburn.There are also new therapies for reflux that can be performed through an endoscope (a flexible tube passed through the mouth into the stomach).", "Causes": "When you eat, food passes from the throat to the stomach through the esophagus. A ring of muscle fibers in the lower esophagus prevents swallowed food from moving back up. These muscle fibers are called the lower esophageal sphincter, or LES.When this ring of muscle does not close all the way, stomach contents can leak back into the esophagus. This is called reflux or gastroesophageal reflux. Reflux may cause symptoms. Harsh stomach acids can also damage the lining of the esophagus.The risk factors for reflux include:Use of alcohol (possibly), Hiatal hernia (a condition in which part of the stomach moves above the diaphragm, which is the muscle that separates the chest and abdominal cavities), Obesity, Pregnancy, Scleroderma, Smoking. Heartburn and gastroesophageal reflux can be brought on or made worse by pregnancy. Symptoms can also be caused by certain medicines, such as: Anticholinergics (e.g., for seasickness), Beta-blockers for high blood pressure or heart disease, Bronchodilators for asthma, Calcium channel blockers for high blood pressure, Dopamine-active drugs for Parkinson's disease, Progestin for abnormal menstrual bleeding or birth control, Sedatives for insomnia or anxiety, Tricyclic antidepressants. Talk to your doctor if you think one of your medicines may be causing heartburn. Never change or stop taking a medicine without first talking to your doctor. Watch this video about:Heartburn", "Prevention": "Following heartburn prevention techniques may help prevent symptoms. Obesity is linked to GERD, so maintaining a healthy body weight may help prevent the condition."}, "Gastroschisis": {"description": "Gastroschisis is a birth defect in which an infant's intestines\u00a0are outside of the body because of a hole in the abdominal wall.", "Possible Complications": "The misplaced abdominal contents can make it difficult for the baby to expand the lungs, leading to breathing problems. Another complication is bowel death. This occurs when intestinal tissue dies due to low blood flow or infection.", "Symptoms": ["Lump in the abdomen", "Intestine sticks through the abdominal wall near the umbilical cord"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination of the infant is enough for the health care provider to diagnose gastroschisis. The baby will have problems with movement and absorption in the gut, because the unprotected intestine is exposed to irritating amniotic fluid.The mother may have shown signs of too much amniotic fluid (polyhydramnios). A prenatal ultrasound often identifies the gastroschisis.", "Treatment": "If gastroschisis is found before birth, the mother will need special monitoring to make sure her unborn baby remains healthy. Plans should be made for careful delivery and immediate management of the problem after birth.Treatment for gastroschisis is surgery to repair the defect. A surgeon will put the bowel back into the abdomen and close the defect, if possible. If the abdominal cavity is too small, a mesh sack is stitched around the borders of the defect and the edges of the defect are pulled up. The sack is referred to as a silo. With growth, the herniated intestine\u00a0returns into the abdominal cavity and the defect can be closed.Other treatments for the baby include nutrients by IV and antibiotics to prevent infection. The baby's temperature must be carefully controlled, because the exposed intestine allows a lot of body heat to escape.", "Causes": "Gastroschisis is a type of hernia. Hernia means rupture. Babies with this condition have a hole in the abdominal wall. The child's intestines usually stick out (protrude) through the hole.The condition looks similar to an omphalocele. An omphalocele, however, is a birth defect in which the infant's intestine or other abdominal organs protrude through a hole in the belly button area and are covered with a membrane.Other related birth defects are rare in patients with gastroschisis."}, "Gaucher disease": {"description": "Gaucher disease is a rare genetic disorder in which a person lacks an enzyme called glucocerebrosidase.", "Possible Complications": "Seizures, Anemia, Thrombocytopenia, Bone problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain and fractures", "Cognitive impairment", "Easy bruising", "Enlarged spleen", "Enlarged liver", "Fatigue", "Heart valve problems", "Lung disease", "Seizures", "Severe swelling\u00a0at birth", "Skin changes "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine you. You may have signs of swelling in the liver and spleen, bone changes, lung disease, eye movement problems, heart problems, or hearing loss.The following tests may be done:Blood test to look for enzyme activity, Bone marrow aspiration, Biopsy of\u00a0your spleen, MRI, CT, X-ray of\u00a0your skeleton, Genetic testing . ", "Treatment": "Enzyme replacement therapy is available. A bone marrow transplant may be needed in severe cases.", "Causes": "Gaucher disease affects an estimated 1 in 50,000 to 1 in 100,000 people in the general population. People of Eastern and Central European (Ashkenazi) Jewish heritage are more likely to get this\u00a0Gaucher disease.It is an autosomal recessive disease. This means that the mother and father must both pass\u00a01 abnormal copy of the disease gene to their child in order for the child to develop the disease. A parent who carries an abnormal copy of the gene but doesn't have the disease is called a silent carrier.The lack of the glucocerebrosidase enzyme causes harmful substances to build up in the liver, spleen, bones, and bone marrow. These substances prevent cells and organs from working properly.There are\u00a03 main subtypes of Gaucher disease:Type 1 disease is most common. It involves bone disease, anemia, an enlarged spleen and low platelets (thrombocytopenia). Type I affects both children and adults. It is most common in the Ashkenazi Jewish population., Type 2 disease usually begins in infancy with severe neurologic involvement. This form can lead to rapid, early death., Type 3 disease may cause liver, spleen, and brain problems.\u00a0People with this type\u00a0may live into adulthood. . ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling\u00a0is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of Gaucher disease. Testing can determine if parents carry the gene that could pass on the Gaucher disease. A prenatal test can also tell if a baby in the womb has Gaucher syndrome."}, "Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of tendon reflexes in the arms and legs", "Tingling or numbness (mild loss of sensation)", "Muscle tenderness or pain (may be a cramp-like pain)", "Uncoordinated movement (cannot walk without help)", "Low blood pressure or poor blood pressure control", "Abnormal heart rate ", "Blurred vision and double vision", "Clumsiness and falling", "Difficulty moving face muscles", "Muscle contractions", "Feeling the heart beat (palpitations) ", "Breathing temporarily stops", "Cannot take a deep breath", "Difficulty breathing", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling", "Fainting", "Feeling light-headed when standing "], "Exams and Tests": "A history of increasing muscle weakness and paralysis may be a sign of GBS, especially if there was a recent illness.A medical exam may show muscle weakness. There may also be problems with blood pressure and heart rate. These are functions that are controlled automatically by the nervous system. The examination may also show that reflexes such as the ankle or knee jerk are decreased or missing.There may be signs of decreased breathing caused by paralysis of the breathing muscles.The following tests may be done:Cerebrospinal fluid sample (spinal tap), ECG to check the electrical activity in the heart, Electromyography (EMG) to test the electrical activity in muscles, Nerve conduction velocity test, Pulmonary function tests. ", "description": "Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome is a serious health problem that occurs when the body's defense (immune) system mistakenly attacks part of the nervous system. This leads to nerve inflammation that causes muscle weakness\u00a0or paralysis and other symptoms.", "Causes": "Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome (GBS) is an autoimmune disorder. With an autoimmune disorder, the body's immune system attacks itself. The exact cause is unknown. GBS can occur at any age. It is most common in people of both sexes between ages 30 and 50.GBS may occur with infections from viruses or bacteria, such as:Influenza, Some gastrointestinal illnesses, Mycoplasma pneumonia, HIV, the virus that causes AIDS, Herpes simplex, Mononucleosis . GBS may also occur with other medical conditions, such as:Systemic lupus erythematosus, Hodgkin disease, After surgery . GBS damages parts of nerves. This nerve damage causes tingling, muscle weakness, and paralysis. GBS most often affects the nerve covering (myelin sheath). This damage is called demyelination. It causes nerve signals to move more slowly. Damage to other parts of the nerve can cause the nerve to stop working.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for GBS. Treatment is aimed at reducing symptoms, treating complications, and speeding up recovery.In the early stages of the illness, a treatment called apheresis or plasmapheresis may be given. This treatment involves removing or blocking the proteins, called antibodies, that attack the nerve cells. Another treatment is intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIg). Both treatments lead to faster improvement, and both are equally effective. There is no advantage to using both treatments. Other treatments help reduce inflammation. When symptoms are severe, treatment in the hospital will be needed. Breathing support will likely be given.Other treatments in the hospital focus on preventing complications. These may include:Blood thinners to prevent blood clots, Breathing support or a breathing tube and ventilator, if the diaphragm is weak, Pain medicines or other medicines to treat pain, Proper body positioning or a feeding tube to prevent choking during feeding, if the muscles used for swallowing are weak , Physical therapy to help keep joints and muscles healthy. "}, "Goodpasture syndrome": {"description": "Some forms of the disease involve just the lung or the kidney, but not both.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic kidney disease, End-stage kidney disease, Lung failure, Rapidly progressive glomerulonephritis, Severe pulmonary hemorrhage (lung bleeding). ", "Symptoms": ["Coughing up blood", "Dry cough", "Shortness of breath", "Bloody urine", "Burning sensation when urinating", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pale skin", "Swelling (edema) in any area of the body, especially in the legs"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may reveal signs of high blood pressure and fluid overload. The health care provider may hear abnormal heart and lung sounds when listening to the chest with a stethoscope.Urinalysis results are usually abnormal, and show blood and protein in the urine. Abnormal red blood cells may be seen.The following tests may also be done:Anti-glomerular basement membrane test, Arterial blood gas, BUN, Chest x-ray, Creatinine (serum), Lung biopsy, Kidney biopsy. ", "Treatment": "The main goal is to remove the harmful antibodies from the blood. A treatment called plasmapheresis removes whole blood from the body and replaces the plasma with fluid, protein, or donated plasma. Removing harmful antibodies may reduce inflammation in the kidneys and lungs.Corticosteroid medications (such as prednisone) and other drugs that suppress or quiet the immune system may be used.Controlling blood pressure is the most important way to delay kidney damage. You may get medicines to control high blood pressure, such as angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors and angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs).You may be told to limit salt and fluids to control swelling. A low to moderate protein diet may be recommended in some cases.You should be closely watched for signs of kidney failure. If kidney failure becomes severe, you may need dialysis.If you permanently lose kidney function, you may need a kidney transplant. A transplant is not done until the level of harmful antibodies drops.", "Causes": "Goodpasture syndrome is an autoimmune disorder. It occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks and destroys healthy body tissue. Persons with this syndrome develop substances that attack a protein called collagen in the tiny air sacs in the lungs and the filtering units (glomeruli) of the kidneys.These substances are called anti-glomerular basement membrane antibodies. The glomerular basement membrane is a part of the kidneys that helps filter waste and extra fluid from the blood. Anti-glomerular basement membrane antibodies are antibodies against this membrane. They can damage the basement membrane, which can lead to kidney damage.Sometimes this disorder is triggered by a viral respiratory infection or by breathing in hydrocarbon solvents. In such cases, the immune system may attack organs or tissues because it mistakes them for these viruses or foreign chemicals.The immune system's faulty response causes bleeding in the air sacs of the lungs and inflammation in the kidney's filtering units.Men are eight times more likely to be affected than women. The disease most commonly occurs in early adulthood.", "Prevention": "Never sniff glue or siphon gasoline with your mouth, which expose the lungs to hydrocarbon solvents and can cause the disease."}, "Generalized anxiety disorder": {"description": "Generalized anxiety disorder (GAD) is a mental health condition in which a person is often worried or anxious about many things and finds it hard to control this anxiety.", "Possible Complications": "Depression and substance abuse may occur with an anxiety disorder.", "Symptoms": ["Problems concentrating", "Fatigue", "Irritability", "Problems falling or staying asleep, or sleep that is restless and unsatisfying", "Restlessness when awake "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no test that can make a diagnosis of GAD. The diagnosis is based on your answers to questions about the symptoms of GAD. Your health care provider will ask about these symptoms, and will likely ask you about other aspects of your mental and physical health. A physical exam or laboratory tests may be done to rule out other conditions that cause similar symptoms.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you feel better and function well in daily life. In less severe cases, talk therapy or medication alone can be helpful. In more severe cases, a combination of these may work best.Talk TherapyMany types of talk therapy may be helpful for GAD. One common and effective talk therapy is cognitive-behavioral therapy (CBT). CBT can help you understand the relationship between your thoughts, your behaviors, and your symptoms. Often CBT involves a set number of visits. During CBT you can learn how to:Understand and gain control of distorted views of stressors, such as other people's behavior or life events., Recognize and replace panic-causing thoughts to help you feel more in control., Manage stress and relax when symptoms occur., Avoid thinking that minor problems will develop into terrible ones. . MedicinesMedicines can also be an important part of treatment. Once you start them, do not stop taking them without talking with your health care provider. Commonly prescribed medicines for GAD include antidepressants and benzodiazepines.Self-careOther than taking medicine and going to therapy, you can help yourself get better by:Reducing caffeine, Not using street drugs, Exercising, getting enough rest, and eating healthy foods . ", "Causes": "The cause of GAD is unknown. Genes may play a role. Stress may also contribute to the development of GAD.GAD is a common condition, affecting about 3% of people. Anyone can develop this disorder, even children. GAD occurs\u00a0more often in women than in men."}, "Galactosemia": {"description": "Galactosemia is a condition in which the body is unable to use (metabolize) the simple sugar galactose.", "Possible Complications": "Cataracts, Cirrhosis of the liver, Death (if there is galactose in the diet), Delayed speech development, Irregular menstrual periods, reduced function of ovaries leading to ovarian failure, Intellectual disability, Severe infection with bacteria (E. coli sepsis), Tremors and uncontrollable motor functions. ", "Symptoms": ["Convulsions", "Irritability", "Lethargy", "Poor feeding (baby refuses to eat formula containing milk)", "Poor weight gain", "Yellow skin and whites of the eyes (jaundice)", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Amino acids in the urine and/or blood plasma (aminoaciduria), Enlarged liver (hepatomegaly), Fluid in the abdomen (ascites), Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia). Newborn screening in many states will test for this condition.Tests include:Blood culture for bacteria infection (E. coli sepsis), Enzyme activity in the red blood cells, Ketones in the urine, Prenatal diagnosis by directly measuring the enzyme galactose-1-phosphate uridyl transferase, \"Reducing substances\" in the infant's urine, and normal or low blood sugar while the infant is being fed breast milk or a formula containing lactose. ", "Treatment": "People with this condition must avoid all milk, milk-containing products (including dry milk), and other foods that contain galactose for life. It is essential to read product labels and be an informed consumer.Infants can be fed with:Soy formula, Meat-based formula or Nutramigen (a protein hydrolysate formula), Another lactose-free formula. Calcium supplements are recommended.", "Causes": "Galactosemia is an inherited disorder. This means it is passed down through families. If both parents carry an abnormal gene that can cause galactosemia, each of their children has a 25% chance of being affected. \r\n It occurs in approximately 1 of every 60,000 births among Caucasians. The rate is different for other groups.There are three forms of the disease:Galactose-1 phosphate uridyl transferase deficiency (classic galactosemia, the most common and most severe form), Deficiency of galactose kinase, Deficiency of galactose-6-phosphate epimerase. People with galactosemia are unable to fully break down the simple sugar galactose. Galactose makes up half of lactose, the sugar found in milk. The other sugar is glucose.If an infant with galactosemia is given milk, substances made from galactose build up in the infant's system. These substances damage the liver, brain, kidneys, and eyes. Persons with galactosemia cannot tolerate any form of milk (human or animal). They must be careful about eating other foods containing galactose.", "Prevention": "It is helpful to know your family history. If you have a family history of galactosemia and want to have children, genetic counseling will help you make decisions about pregnancy and prenatal testing. Once the diagnosis of galactosemia is made, genetic counseling is recommended for other members of the family.Many states screen all newborns for galactosemia. If parents learn that the test indicates possible galactosemia, they should promptly stop giving their infant milk products and ask their health care provider about having blood tests that can be done\u00a0to confirm a diagnosis of\u00a0galactosemia."}, "Glossitis": {"description": "Glossitis is a problem in which the tongue is swollen and changes color, often making the surface of the tongue appear smooth. Geographic tongue is a type of glossitis.", "Symptoms": ["Problems chewing, swallowing, or speaking", "Smooth surface of the tongue", "Sore, tender, or swollen tongue", "Pale or bright red color to the tongue", "Tongue swelling", "blocked airway", "Problems speaking, chewing, or swallowing "], "Exams and Tests": "Your dentist or health care provider will do an exam to look for:Finger-like bumps on the surface of the tongue (called papillae) that may be missing, Swollen tongue (or patches of swelling). The health care provider may ask questions about your health history and lifestyle to help discover the cause of tongue inflammation. You may need blood tests may be done to rule out other medical problems.", "Causes": "Glossitis is often a symptom of other conditions, such as: \r\n Allergic reactions to oralcare products, foods, or medicine, Dry mouth due to Sjogren syndrome [link to 01-000456], Infection from bacteria, yeast or viruses (including oral herpes), Injury (such as from burns, rough teeth, or bad-fitting dentures0, Skin conditions that affect the mouth, Irritants such as tobacco, alcohol, hot foods, spices, or other irritants, Hormonal factors. At times, glossitis may be passed down in families.", "Prevention": "Good oral care (thorough tooth brushing and flossing and regular dental checkups) may help prevent glossitis.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce swelling and soreness. Most people do not need to go to the hospital unless the tongue is very swollen. Treatment may include:Good oral care. Brush your teeth thoroughly at least twice a day and floss at least once a day., Antibiotics or other medicines to treat infection., Diet changes and supplements to treat nutrition problems., Avoiding irritants (such as hot or spicy foods, alcohol, and tobacco) to ease discomfort.. "}, "Gout": {"description": "Gout is a\u00a0type of arthritis. It occurs when uric acid builds up in blood and causes inflammation in the joints.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic gouty arthritis, Kidney stones, Deposits in the kidneys, leading to chronic kidney failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Only one or a few joints are affected. The big toe, knee, or ankle joints are most often affected.", "The pain starts suddenly, often during the night. Pain is often described as throbbing, crushing, or excruciating.", "The joint appears warm and red. It is usually very tender and swollen (it hurts to\u00a0put a sheet or blanket over it).", "There may be a fever.", "The attack may go away in a few days, but may return from time to time. Additional attacks often last longer. "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Synovial fluid analysis (shows uric acid crystals), Uric acid - blood, Joint x-rays (may be normal), Synovial biopsy, Uric acid - urine. Not everyone with high uric acid levels in the blood has gout. A level over 7 mg/dL is high.", "Treatment": "Take medicines for gout as soon as you can if you have a sudden attack.Take nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen, naproxen, or indomethacin\u00a0when symptoms begin. Talk to your health care provider about the correct dose. You will need stronger doses for a few days. Your health care provider may prescribe strong painkillers such as codeine, hydrocodone, and oxycodone., A prescription medicine called colchicine helps reduce pain, swelling, and inflammation., Corticosteroids (such as prednisone) can also be very effective. Your doctor may inject the inflamed joint with steroids to relieve the pain., The pain often goes away within 12 hours of starting treatment. Most of the time all pain is gone within 48 hours.. Your doctor may prescribe medicines you take daily (such as allopurinol or probenecid) to decrease uric acid levels in your blood. You may need these medicines if:You have several attacks during the same year or your attacks are quite severe., You have damage to joints., You have tophi., You have kidney disease or uric acid kidney stones.. Diet and lifestyle changes may help prevent gouty attacks:Decrease\u00a0alcohol, especially beer (some wine may be\u00a0helpful)., Lose weight., Exercise daily., Limit your intake of red meat and sugary beverages., Choose healthy foods such as dairy products, vegetables, nuts, legumes, fruits (less sugary ones), and whole grains., Drink coffee and take\u00a0vitamin C supplements (may help some people).. ", "Causes": "Gout is caused by having higher-than-normal levels of uric acid in your body. This may occur if:Your body makes too much uric acid, Your body has a hard time getting rid of uric acid . If too much uric acid builds up in the fluid around the joints (synovial fluid), uric acid crystals form. These crystals cause the joint to swell and become inflamed.The exact cause is unknown. Gout may run in families. The problem is more common in men, in women after menopause, and\u00a0people who drink alcohol.The condition may also develop in people with:Diabetes, Kidney disease, Obesity, Sickle cell anemia and other anemias, Leukemia and other blood cancers . Gout may occur after taking medicines that interfere with the removal of uric acid from the body. People who take certain medicines, such as hydrochlorothiazide and other water pills, may have higher levels of uric acid in the blood.", "Prevention": "You may not be able to prevent gout but may be able to avoid things that trigger symptoms."}, "Gastrointestinal perforation": {"description": "Gastrointestinal perforation is a hole that develops through the wall of the esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large bowel, rectum, or gallbladder. This condition is a medical emergency.", "Possible Complications": "Even with surgery, infection is the most common complication of the condition. Infections can be either inside the abdomen (abdominal abscess or peritonitis), or throughout the whole body. Body-wide infection is called sepsis. It can be very serious and can lead to death.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Severe abdominal pain\r\n  ", "\r\n  Chills\r\n  ", "\r\n  Fever\r\n  ", "\r\n  Nausea\r\n  ", "\r\n  Vomiting\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "X-rays of the chest or abdomen may show air in the abdominal cavity. This is called free air. It is a sign of a tear. A CT scan of the abdomen often shows where the hole is located. The white blood cell count is often higher than normal.", "Treatment": "Treatment most often involves surgery to repair the hole. Sometimes, a small part of the intestine must be removed. A temporary colostomy or ileostomy (to drain the small or large intestine) may be needed.In rare cases, people can be treated antibiotics alone if the perforation has closed. This can be confirmed by a physical exam, blood tests, CT scan, and x-rays.", "Causes": "Gastrointestinal perforation can be caused by a variety of illnesses. These include:Appendicitis, Cancer, Crohn's disease, Diverticulitis, Gallbladder disease, Peptic\u00a0ulcer disease, Ulcerative colitis. It may also be caused by abdominal surgery.", "Prevention": "People will often have a few days of pain before the intestinal perforation occurs. If you have pain in the abdomen, see your health care provider right away. Treatment is much simpler and safer when it is started before the perforation occurs."}, "Graft-versus-host disease": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain or cramps, nausea, vomiting, and\u00a0diarrhea", "Jaundice (yellow coloring of the skin or eyes) or other liver problems", "Skin rash, itching, redness on areas of the skin\u00a0 ", "Dry eyes or vision changes", "Dry mouth, white patches inside the mouth, and sensitivity to spicy foods", "Fatigue, muscle weakness, and chronic pain", "Joint pain or stiffness", "Skin rash with raised, discolored areas, as well as skin tightening or thickening", "Shortness of breath", "Vaginal dryness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Several lab and imaging tests can be done to diagnose and monitor problems caused by GVHD.A biopsy of the skin, mucus membranes in the mouth, or other parts of the body may help confirm the diagnosis.", "description": "Graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) is a complication that can occur after a stem cell or bone marrow transplant. With GVHD, the newly transplanted donor cells attack the transplant recipient's body.", "Causes": "GVHD may occur after a bone marrow or stem cell transplant in which someone receives bone marrow tissue or cells from a\u00a0donor. This type of transplant is\u00a0called allogeneic.\u00a0The new, transplanted cells regard the recipient's body as foreign. When this happens, the newly transplanted cells attack the recipient's body.GVHD does not occur when someone receives his or her own cells during a transplant. This type of transplant is\u00a0called autologous.Before a transplant, tissue and cells from possible donors are checked to see how closely they match the person having the transplant. GVHD is less likely to occur, or symptoms will be milder, when the match is close. The chance of GVHD is:Around 30 - 40% when the donor and recipient are related, Around 60 - 80% when the donor and recipient are not related . ", "Treatment": "After a transplant, the recipient usually takes drugs that suppress the immune system. This helps reduce the chances (or severity) of GVHD. A number of medicines and other treatments are often started after the transplant. You will continue taking the medicines until your health care provider thinks the risk of GVHD is low. Many of these medicines have side effects, including kidney and liver damage. You will have tests to watch for these problems on a regular basis.Treatment of chronic GVHD includes prednisone (a steroid), or the same drugs that suppress the immune system. "}, "Gastritis": {"description": "Gastritis can last for only a short time (acute gastritis). It may also linger for months to years (chronic gastritis).\r\n", "Possible Complications": "Blood loss and increased risk of gastric cancer can occur.", "Symptoms": ["Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pain in the upper part of the belly or abdomen", "Black stools", "Vomiting blood or coffee-ground like material"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be needed are:Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia or low blood count, Examination of the stomach with an endoscope (esophagogastroduodenoscopy or EGD), H. pylori tests, Stool test to check for small amounts of blood in the stools, which may be a sign of bleeding in the stomach. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on what is causing the problem. Some of the causes will disappear over time.\r\nYou may need to stop taking aspirin, ibuprofen, naproxen, or other medicines that may be causing gastritis. Always talk to your doctor before stopping any medicine.\r\nYou may use other over-the-counter and prescription drugs that decrease the amount of acid in the stomach, such as:Antacids\r\n  , H2 antagonists: famotidine (Pepsid), cimetidine (Tagamet), ranitidine (Zantac), and nizatidine (Axid)\r\n  , Proton pump inhibitors (PPIs) -- omeprazole (Prilosec), esomeprazole (Nexium), iansoprazole (Prevacid), rabeprazole (AcipHex), and pantoprazole (Protonix)\r\n  . Antacids may be used to treat chronic gastritis caused by infection with Helicobacter pylori bacteria.", "Causes": "The most common causes of gastritis are:\r\nCertain medicines, such as aspirin, ibuprofen, or naproxen\r\n  , Heavy alcohol drinking\r\n  , Infection of the stomach with a bacteria called Helicobacter pylori. Less common causes are:\r\nAutoimmune disorders (such as pernicious anemia)\r\n  , Backflow of bile into the stomach (bile reflux)\r\n  , Cocaine abuse\r\n  , Eating or drinking caustic or corrosive substances (such as poisons)\r\n  , Extreme stress\r\n  , Viral infection, such as cytomegalovirus and herpes simplex virus (more often occurs in people with a weak immune system)\r\n  . Trauma or a severe, sudden illness such as major surgery, kidney failure, or being placed on a breathing machine may cause gastritis.\r\n", "Prevention": "Avoid long-term use of substances that can irritate your stomach such as aspirin, anti-inflammatory drugs, or alcohol."}, "Glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency": {"description": "Glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase (G-6-PD) deficiency is a hereditary condition in which red blood cells break down when the body is exposed to certain drugs or the stress of infection.", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, kidney failure or death may occur following a severe hemolytic event.", "Symptoms": ["Dark urine", "Enlarged spleen", "Fatigue", "Pallor", "Rapid heart rate", "Shortness of breath", "Yellow skin color (jaundice)"], "Exams and Tests": "A blood test can be done to check the level of G6PD. See: G6PD screenOther tests that may be done include:Bilirubin level, Complete blood count, including red blood cell count, Hemoglobin - blood, Hemoglobin - urine, Haptoglobin level, LDH test, Methemoglobin reduction test, Reticulocyte count. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve:Medicines to treat an infection, if present, Stopping any drugs that are causing red blood cell destruction, Transfusions, in some cases. ", "Causes": "G6PD deficiency occurs when a person is missing or doesn't have enough of an enzyme called glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase, which helps red blood cells work properly.Too little G6PD leads to the destruction of red blood cells. This process is called hemolysis. When this process is actively occurring, it is called a hemolytic episode. The episodes are usually brief, because the body continues to produce new red blood cells, which have normal activity.Red blood cell destruction can be triggered by infections, severe stress, certain foods (such as fava beans), and certain drugs, including:Antimalarial drugs, Aspirin, Nitrofurantoin, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), Quinidine, Quinine, Sulfa drugs. Other chemicals, such as those in mothballs, can also trigger an episode.In the United States, G6PD deficiency is more common among blacks than whites. Men are more likely to have this disorder than women.You are more likely to develop this condition if you:Are African American, Are of Middle Eastern decent, particularly Kurdish or Sephardic Jewish, Are male, Have a family history of the deficiency. A form of this disorder is common in whites of Mediterranean descent. This form is also associated with acute episodes of hemolysis. Episodes are longer and more severe than in the other types of the disorder.", "Prevention": "Persons with G6PD deficiency must strictly avoid things that can trigger an episode. Talk to your health care provider about your medications.Genetic counseling or testing may be available to those who have a family history of the condition."}, "Gender dysphoria": {"Symptoms": ["Be disgusted by their own genitals", "Be rejected by their peers, feel alone", "Believe that they will grow up to become the opposite sex", "Say that they want to be the opposite sex", "Dress like the opposite sex", "Feel alone", "Want to live as a person of the opposite sex", "Wish to be rid of their own genitals", "Cross-dress, show habits typical of the opposite sex", "Have depression or anxiety", "Withdraw from social interaction"], "Exams and Tests": "The feeling of being in the body of the \"wrong\" gender must last for at least 2 years for this diagnosis to be made. A history and psychiatric evaluation can confirm the person's constant desire to be the opposite sex.", "description": "Gender dysphoria is a condition in which there is a conflict between a person's physical gender and the gender he or she identifies with. For example, a person who is physically a boy may actually feel and act like a girl. The person is very uncomfortable with the gender they were born as.", "Causes": "Gender dysphoria used to be known as gender identity disorder. People with gender dysphoria may act as members of the opposite sex. The condition may affect:Choice of sexual partners, Mannerisms, behavior, and dress, Self-concept. Gender dysphoria is not the same as homosexuality. Identity conflicts need to continue over time to be considered gender dysphoria. How the gender conflict occurs is different in each person. For example, some people may cross-dress while others want sex-change surgery. Some people of one gender privately identify more with the other gender.People who are born with ambiguous genitalia, which can raise questions about their gender, may develop gender dysphoria.The cause of gender dysphoria is unknown. Hormones in the womb, genes, social and environmental factors (such as parenting) may be involved. ", "Treatment": "Individual and family therapy is recommended for children to create a supportive environment at home and in school. Individual and, if appropriate, couples therapy is recommended for adults. Sex reassignment through surgery and hormonal therapy is an option. But identity problems may continue after this treatment."}, "Gas gangrene": {"description": "Gas gangrene is a potentially deadly form of tissue death (gangrene).", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Delirium, Disfiguring or disabling permanent tissue damage, Jaundice with liver damage, Kidney failure, Shock, Spread of infection through the body (sepsis), Stupor. ", "Symptoms": ["Air under the skin (subcutaneous emphysema)", "Blisters filled with brown-red fluid", "Drainage from the tissues, foul-smelling brown-red or bloody fluid (serosanguineous discharge)", "Increased heart rate (tachycardia)", "Moderate to high fever", "Moderate to severe pain around a skin injury", "Pale skin color, later becoming dusky and changing to dark red or purple", "Swelling that worsens around a skin injury", "Sweating", "Vesicle formation, combining into large blisters", "Yellow color to the skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal signs of shock. Tests that may be done include: Tissue and fluid cultures to test for Clostridium bacteria , Blood culture to determine the bacteria causing the infection, Gram stain of fluid from the infected area, X-ray, CT scan, or MRI of the area may show gas in the tissues. . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed quickly to remove dead, damaged, and infected tissueSurgical removal (amputation) of an arm or leg may be needed to control the spread of infection. Amputation sometimes must be done before all test results are available.Antibiotics are also given. These medicines are given through a vein (intravenously). Pain medicines may also be prescribed. In some cases, hyperbaric oxygen treatment will be tried.", "Causes": "Gas gangrene is most often caused by a bacterium called Clostridium perfringens. It also can be caused by group A streptococcus, Staphylococcus aureus, and Vibrio vulnificus.Clostridium is found nearly everywhere. As the bacteria grow inside the body, it makes gas and harmful substances (toxins) that can damage body tissues, cells, and blood vessels.Gas gangrene develops suddenly. It usually occurs at the site of trauma or a recent surgical wound. In some cases, it occurs without an irritating event. Persons most at risk of gas gangrene usually have blood vessel disease (atherosclerosis, or hardening of the arteries), diabetes, or colon cancer.", "Prevention": "Clean any skin injury thoroughly. Watch for signs of infection (such as redness, pain, drainage, or swelling around a wound). See your health care provider promptly if these occur."}, "Genital warts": {"description": "Genital warts are spread through sexual contact.", "Possible Complications": "Some types of HPV can cause cancer of the cervix and vulva. They are the main cause of cervical cancer.Genital warts may become numerous and quite large. These will need further treatment.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Flesh-colored spots that are raised or flat\r\n  ", "\r\n  Growths that look like the top of a cauliflower\r\n  ", "\r\n  Inside the vagina or anus\r\n  ", "\r\n  Outside the vagina or anus, or on nearby skin\r\n  ", "\r\n  On the cervix inside the body\r\n  ", "Penis", "Scrotum", "Groin area", "Thighs", "Inside or around the anus ", "Lips", "Mouth", "Tongue", "Throat ", "Increased dampness in the genital area near the warts", "Increased vaginal discharge", "Genital itching", "Vaginal bleeding during or after sex "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam.In women, this includes a pelvic exam.An office procedure called colposcopy is used to spot warts that cannot be seen with the naked eye. It uses a light and a low-power microscope to your health care provider find and then take samples (biopsy) abnormal areas in your cervix.The virus that causes genital warts can cause abnormal results on a Pap smear. If you have these types of changes, you will probably need more frequent Pap smears for a while.An HPV DNA test can tell if you have a high-risk type of HPV known to cause cervical cancer. This test may be done:As a screening test for women over age 30, In women of any age who have a slightly abnormal Pap test result . ", "Treatment": "Genital warts must be treated by a doctor. Do not use over-the-counter medicines meant for other kinds of warts.Treatment may include:A skin treatment done in the doctor's office, Prescription medicine that you apply at home several times a week. The warts may be removed with minor procedures, including:Freezing (cryosurgery), Burning (electrocauterization), Laser therapy, Surgery. If you have genital warts, all of your sexual partners must be examined by a health care provider and treated if warts are found. Even if you do not have symptoms, you must be treated. This is to prevent complications and spreading the condition to others.You will need to return to your health care provider after treatment to make sure all the warts are gone.Regular Pap smears are recommended if you are a woman who has had genital warts, or if you partner had them. If you had warts on your cervix, you may need to have Pap smears every 3 to 6 months after the first treatment.Women with precancerous changes caused by HPV infection may need further treatment.", "Causes": "The virus that causes genital warts is called human papilloma virus (HPV). More than 70 different types of HPV exist. Certain types of HPV can lead to precancerous changes in the cervix, or to\u00a0cervical cancer or anal cancer. These are called high-risk types of HPV.Not all types of HPV cause genital warts. Other types of HPV cause warts on other parts of the skin, such as the hands.HPV infection around the genitals is common. Most people have no symptoms. In women, HPV can spread to areas inside, on the walls of the vagina and cervix. They are not easy to see without special medical procedures.Important facts about HPV:\r\n HPV infection spreads from one person to another through sexual contact involving the anus, mouth, or vagina. The virus can be spread, even if you do not see the warts.\r\n , \r\n You may not see warts for 6 weeks to 6 months after becoming infected. You may not notice them for years.\r\n , \r\n Not everyone who has come into contact with the HPV virus and genital warts will develop them.\r\n . You are more likely to get genital warts and spread them more quickly if you:\r\n Have multiple sexual partners\r\n , \r\n Are sexually active at an early age\r\n , \r\n Use tobacco and/or alcohol\r\n , \r\n Have a viral infection, such as herpes, and are stressed at the same time \r\n , \r\n Are pregnant\r\n , \r\n Have a weakened immune system due to an illness or medication \r\n . If a child has genital warts, you should suspect sexual abuse as a possible cause.", "Prevention": "HPV can be passed from person to person even when there are no visible warts or other symptoms. Practicing safer sex can help reduce your risk of getting HPV and cervical cancer:Always use male and female condoms. But be aware that condoms cannot fully protect you. This is because the virus or warts can also be on the nearby skin., Have only one sexual partner, who you know is infection-free., Limit the number of sexual partners you have over time., Avoid partners who take part in high-risk sexual activities. . Two vaccines are available:They protect against the HPV types that cause most cervical cancers in women., They are recommended for girls and women ages 9 through 26., They are given as a series of three shots., One of the two vaccines protects against genital and anal warts in boys and men. It is recommended for boys and men ages 9 through 26. . Ask your health care provider whether the HPV vaccine is right for you."}, "Giardia infection": {"description": "Giardiasis is an infection of the small intestine caused by a tiny parasite (protozoa) called Giardia lamblia.", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration (when your body does not have as much water and fluids as it should have\r\n , Malabsorption (inadequate absorption of nutrients from the intestinal tract), Weight loss. ", "Symptoms": ["\r\nGas or bloating", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Low-grade fever", "Nausea", "Weight loss and loss of body fluids"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include: \r\n Stool antigen test to check for Giardia, Stool ova and parasites exam, String test (rarely performed). ", "Treatment": "If there are no symptoms or only mild symptoms, no treatment may be needed. Some infections go away on their own within a few weeks. Medicines may be used for:Severe symptoms or symptoms that do not go away, People who work in a day care center or nursing home, so that they do not spread the disease. Treatment is successful for most people. A change in antibiotic therapy will be tried if symptoms do not go away. Side effects from some of the medications used to treat this condition include:Metallic taste in the mouth, Nausea, Severe reaction to alcohol. In most pregnant women, treatment should not start until after delivery. Some drugs used to treat the infection can be harmful to the unborn baby.", "Causes": "The parasite lives in soil, food, and water. It may also be found on surfaces that have come into contact with animal or human waste. You may become infected if you: Are exposed to a family member with giardiasis, Drink water from lakes or streams where animals such as beavers and muskrats, or domestic animals such as sheep, have left their waste, Eat raw or undercooked food that has been contaminated with the parasite, Have direct person-to-person contact in day care centers, long-term care homes, or nursing homes with people who are infected with the parasite, Have unprotected anal sex. Travelers are at risk for giardiasis throughout the world. Campers and hikers are at risk if they drink untreated water from streams and lakes. ", "Prevention": "Purify all stream, pond, river, lake, or well water before drinking it. Use methods such as boiling, filtration, or iodine treatment. Workers in day care centers or institutions should use good handwashing and hygiene techniques when going from child to child or patient to patient.Safer sexual practices may decrease the risk of getting or spreading giardiasis. People practicing anal sex should be especially careful.Peel or wash fresh fruits and vegetables before eating them."}, "Gastroesophageal reflux in infants": {"description": "Gastroesophageal reflux occurs when stomach contents leak backward from the stomach into the esophagus. This causes \"spitting up\" in infants.", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration pneumonia caused by stomach contents passing into the lungs, Irritation and swelling of the esophagus, Scarring and narrowing of the esophagus. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough, especially after eating", "Excessive crying as if in pain", "Excessive vomiting during the first few weeks of life; worse after eating", "Extremely forceful vomiting", "Not feeding well", "Refusing to eat", "Slow growth", "Weight loss", "Wheezing or other breathing problems"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can often diagnose the problem asking about the infant's symptoms and doing a physical exam.Infants who have severe symptoms or are not growing well may need more testing to find the best treatment. Tests that may be done include:Esophageal pH monitoring of stomach contents entering the esophagus, X-ray of the esophagus, X-ray of the upper gastrointestinal system after the baby has been given a special liquid, called contrast, to drink. ", "Treatment": "Often, no feeding changes are needed for infants who spit up but are growing well and seem otherwise content. Your doctor or nurse may suggest simple changes to help the symptoms such as: Burp the baby after drinking 1 to 2 ounces of formula, or after feeding on each side if breastfeeding., Add 1 tablespoon of rice cereal to 2 ounces of formula, milk, or expressed breast milk. If needed, change the nipple size or cut a small x in the nipple., Hold the baby upright for 20 - 30 minutes after feeding., Raise the head of the crib. However, your infant should still sleep on the back, unless your healthcare provider suggests otherwise. . When the infant begins to eat solid food, feeding thickened foods may help.Medicines can be used to reduce acid or increase the movement of the intestines.", "Causes": "When a person eats, food passes from the throat to the stomach through the esophagus. The esophagus is called the food pipe or swallowing tube.A ring of muscle fibers prevents food at the top of the stomach prevents food from moving up into the esophagus. These muscle fibers are called the lower esophageal sphincter, or LES. If this muscle doesn't close well, food can leak back into the esophagus. This is called gastroesophageal reflux (GERD).A small amount of gastroesophageal reflux is normal young infants. However, ongoing reflux with frequent vomiting can irritate the esophagus and make the infant fussy. Severe reflux that causes weight loss or breathing problems is not normal."}, "Genital herpes": {"description": "This article focuses on HSV type 2 (HSV-2) infection.", "Possible Complications": "Pregnant women who have an active genital herpes infection when they give birth may pass the infection to their baby. Herpes can be severe and life threatening in newborn babies. It is important that your provider know if you have herpes sores or have had an outbreak in the past. This will allow steps to be taken to prevent passing the infection to the baby.The virus may spread to other parts of the body, including the brain, eyes, esophagus, liver, spinal cord, or lungs. These complications can develop in people who have a weakened immune system due to HIV or certain medicines.", "Symptoms": ["Decreased appetite", "Fever", "General sick feeling (malaise)", "Muscle aches in the lower back, buttocks, thighs, or knees", "Swollen and tender lymph nodes in the groin ", "Outer vaginal lips (labia), vagina, cervix, around the anus, and on the thighs or buttocks (in women)", "Penis, scrotum, around the anus, on the thighs or buttocks (in men)\u00a0", "Tongue, mouth, eyes, gums, lips, fingers, and other parts of the body (in both genders)", "Painful urination", "Vaginal discharge (in women) or inability to empty the bladder\u00a0that requires\u00a0a urinary catheter"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests can be done on skin sores or blisters to diagnose herpes. These tests are most often done when someone has a first outbreak and when a pregnant women develops genital herpes symptoms. Tests include:Culture of fluid from a blister or open sore. This test may be positive for herpes simplex virus. It is most useful during the first outbreak., Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) done on fluid from a blister. This is the most accurate test to tell whether the herpes virus is present in the blister., Blood tests that check for antibody level to the herpes virus. These tests can identify whether a person has been infected with the herpes virus, even between outbreaks. A positive test result when a person has never had an outbreak would indicate exposure to the virus at some time in the past. . ", "Treatment": "Genital herpes cannot be cured. Antiviral medicines (such as acyclovir or valcyclovir) may be prescribed.These medicines help relieve pain and discomfort during an outbreak by healing the sores more quickly. They seem to work better during a first attack than in later outbreaks., For repeat outbreaks, the medicine should be taken as soon as tingling, burning, or itching begins, or as soon as blisters appear., Persons who have many outbreaks may take these medicines daily over a period of time. This helps prevent outbreaks or shorten their length. It can also reduce the chance of giving herpes to someone else. . Pregnant women may be treated for herpes during the last month of pregnancy to reduce the chance of having an outbreak at the time of delivery. If there is an outbreak around the time of delivery, a C-section will be recommended to reduce the chance of infecting the baby.Side effects are rare with acyclovir and valcyclovir. Follow your health care provider's advice on how to care for your herpes symptoms at home.", "Causes": "Genital herpes affects the skin or mucus membranes of the genitals. The virus is spread from one person to another during sexual contact.There are two kinds of HSV:HSV-1 most often affects the mouth and lips and causes cold sores or fever blisters. But it can spread from the mouth to the genitals during oral sex., HSV-2 most often causes genital herpes. HSV-2 can be spread through fluids (secretions) from the mouth or genitals. . You may become infected with herpes if your skin, vagina, penis, or mouth comes into contact with someone who already has herpes.You are most likely to get herpes if you touch the skin of someone who has herpes sores, blisters, or a rash. But the virus can still be spread, even when no sores or other symptoms are present. In some cases, you do not know you are infected.Genital HSV-2 infections are more common in women than men.", "Prevention": "If you have genital herpes, you should tell your partner that you have the disease, even if you do not have symptoms.Condoms are the best way to protect against catching genital herpes during sexual activity.Use a condom correctly and consistently to help prevent spread of the disease., Only latex condoms prevent infection. Animal membrane (sheepskin) condoms do not work because the virus can pass through them., Using the female condom also reduces the risk of spreading genital herpes., Although it is much less likely, you can still get genital herpes if you use a condom. . "}, "Gilles de la Tourette syndrome": {"description": "The condition is commonly called Tourette syndrome.", "Possible Complications": "Conditions that may occur in people who have Tourette syndrome include:Anger control issues, Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), Impulsive behavior, Obsessive-compulsive disorder, Poor social skills. These conditions need to be diagnosed and treated.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n Arm thrusting\r\n ", "\r\n Eye blinking\r\n ", "\r\n Jumping\r\n ", "\r\n Kicking\r\n ", "\r\n Repeated throat clearing or sniffing\r\n ", "\r\n Shoulder shrugging\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "There are no lab tests to diagnose Tourette syndrome.\u00a0A health care provider\u00a0will likely\u00a0do an examination to rule out other causes of the symptoms.To be diagnosed with Tourette syndrome, a person must:Have had many motor tics and one or more vocal tics, although these tics may not have occurred at the same time, Have tics that occur many times a day, nearly every day or on and off, for a period of more than 1 year. During this period, there must not have been a tic-free period of more than 3 months in a row., Have started the tics before age 18, Have no other brain problem that could be a likely cause of the symptoms. ", "Treatment": "Persons who have mild symptoms are not treated. This is because the side effects of the medicines may be worse than the symptoms of Tourette syndrome.Different medicines are available to treat Tourette syndrome. The exact medicine that is used depends on the symptoms and any other medical problems.Deep brain stimulation may be recommended for the main symptoms of Tourette syndrome and the obsessive-compulsive behaviors, but not when these symptoms occur in the same person.", "Causes": "Tourette syndrome is named for Georges Gilles de la Tourette, who first described this disorder in 1885. It is likely the disorder is passed down through families.The syndrome may be linked to problems in certain areas of the brain. It may have to do with chemical substances (dopamine, serotonin, and norepinephrine) that help nerve cells\u00a0signal one another.Tourette syndrome can be either severe or mild.\u00a0Many people with very mild tics may not be aware of them and never seek medical help. Far fewer people have more severe forms of Tourette syndrome.Tourette syndrome is four times as likely to occur in boys as in girls.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. "}, "Glaze poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Metallic taste", "Visual problems", "Yellow eyes ", "Decreased urine output ", "Abdominal pain", "Constipation", "Diarrhea", "Increased thirst", "Loss of appetite", "Vomiting", "Weight loss ", "Convulsions", "Low blood pressure", "High blood pressure", "Fatigue", "Joint pain", "Muscle soreness", "Paralysis", "Weakness ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Easily excitable", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Inability to sleep", "Irritability", "Lack of desire to do anything", "Tremor", "Twitching", "Uncooperativeness", "Uncoordinated movements", "Pale skin", "Yellow skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Graves disease": {"Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Breast enlargement in men (possible)", "Difficulty concentrating", "Double vision", "Eyeballs that bulge (exophthalmos)", "Eye irritation and tearing", "Fatigue", "Frequent bowel movements", "Goiter (possible)", "Heat intolerance", "Increased appetite", "Increased sweating", "Irregular menstrual periods in women", "Muscle weakness of the hips and shoulders", "Moodiness", "Nervousness", "Rapid or irregular heartbeat (palpitations or arrhythmia)", "Restlessness and difficulty sleeping", "Shortness of breath with activity", "Tremor", "Weight loss (weight gain in some cases) ", "Rapid or irregular heartbeat", "Chest pain", "Memory loss", "Weakness and fatigue "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam and may find that you have an increased heart rate.\u00a0An exam of\u00a0your neck may find that\u00a0your thyroid gland is enlarged (goiter).Other tests include:Blood tests to measure levels of TSH, T3, and free T4, Radioactive iodine uptake and scan\r\n . This disease may also affect the following test results:Orbit CT scan or ultrasound, Thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin (TSI), Thyroid peroxidase (TPO) antibody, Anti-TSH receptor antibody. ", "description": "Graves disease is an autoimmune disorder that leads to overactivity of the thyroid gland (hyperthyroidism). An autoimmune disorder is a condition that occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue.", "Causes": "The thyroid gland is an important organ of the endocrine system.\u00a0The gland\u00a0is located\u00a0at the front of the neck above where the collarbones meet. This gland releases the hormones thyroxine (T4) and triiodothyronine (T3), which control body metabolism. Controlling metabolism is\u00a0important for regulating mood, weight, and mental and physical energy levels.When\u00a0the body makes too much thyroid hormone, the condition is called hyperthyroidism. (An underactive thyroid leads to hypothyroidism.)Graves disease is the most common cause of hyperthyroidism. It is\u00a0due to\u00a0an abnormal immune system response that causes the thyroid gland to produce too much thyroid hormone. Graves disease is most common in women over age 20.\u00a0But the disorder\u00a0can occur at any age and\u00a0can affect men as well.", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at controlling your overactive thyroid. Medicines called beta-blockers are often used to treat symptoms of rapid heart rate, sweating, and anxiety until the hyperthyroidism is controlled. Hyperthyroidism is treated with one or more of the following:Antithyroid medications, Radioactive iodine, Surgery . If you have had radioactive iodine treatment or surgery, you will need to take replacement thyroid hormones for the rest of your life. This is because these treatments destroy or remove the gland.Some of the eye problems related to Graves disease usually improve when hyperthyroidism is treated with medications, radiation, or surgery. Radioactive iodine can sometimes make eye problems worse. Eye problems are worse in people who smoke, even after the hyperthyroidism is treated.Sometimes prednisone (a steroid medication that suppresses the immune system) is needed to reduce eye irritation and swelling.You may need to tape your eyes closed at night to prevent drying. Sunglasses and eye drops may reduce eye irritation. In rare cases, surgery or radiation therapy (different from radioactive iodine) may be needed to prevent further damage to the eye and loss of vision."}, "Gingivitis": {"description": "Gingivitis is inflammation of the gums.", "Possible Complications": "Gingivitis returns, Periodontitis, Infection or abscess of the gums or the jaw bones, Trench mouth. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding gums (blood on toothbrush even with gentle brushing of the teeth)", "Bright red or red-purple appearance to gums", "Gums that are tender when touched, but otherwise painless", "Mouth sores", "Swollen gums", "Shiny appearance to gums"], "Exams and Tests": "The dentist will examine your mouth and teeth and look for soft, swollen, red-purple gums. The gums are most often painless or mildly tender.Plaque and tartar may be seen at the base of the teeth. The dentist will use a probe to closely examine your gums in order to determine if you have gingivitis or periodontitis.   Most of the time, more tests are not needed. However, dental x-rays may be done to see if the disease has spread to the supporting structures of the teeth.", "Treatment": "The goal is to reduce inflammation. The dentist or dental hygienist will clean your teeth. The may use different tools to loosen and remove deposits from the teeth.Careful oral hygiene is necessary after professional tooth cleaning. The dentist or hygienist will show you how to brush and floss. Your dentist may recommend:Having professional teeth cleaning in addition to brushing and flossing twice a year, or more often for worse cases of gum disease., Using antibacterial mouth rinses or other aids, Getting misaligned teeth repaired, Replacing dental and orthodontic appliances. Any other related illnesses or conditions should be treated.", "Causes": "Gingivitis is a form of periodontal disease. Periodontal disease is inflammation and infection that destroys the tissues that support the teeth. This can\u00a0include the gums, the periodontal ligaments, and the tooth sockets (alveolar bone).Gingivitis is due to the long-term effects of plaque deposits on your teeth. Plaque is a sticky material made of bacteria, mucus, and food debris that\u00a0builds up\u00a0on the exposed parts of the teeth. It is also a major cause of tooth decay. If you do not remove plaque, it turns into a hard deposit called tartar (or calculus) that becomes trapped at the base of the tooth. Plaque and tartar irritate and inflame the gums. Bacteria and the toxins they produce cause the gums to become infected, swollen, and tender.The following raise your risk for gingivitis:Certain infections and body-wide (systemic) diseases, Poor dental hygiene, Pregnancy (hormonal changes increase the sensitivity of the gums), Uncontrolled diabetes, Misaligned teeth, rough edges of fillings, and ill-fitting or unclean mouth appliances (such as braces, dentures, bridges, and crowns) , Use of certain medications, including phenytoin, bismuth, and some birth control pills. Many people have some amount of gingivitis. It often develops during puberty or early adulthood due to hormonal changes. It may last or come back often, depending on the health of your teeth and gums.", "Prevention": "Good oral hygiene is the best way to prevent gingivitis. You should brush your teeth at least twice a day. You should floss at least once a day. Your dentist may recommend brushing and flossing after every meal and at bedtime. Ask your dentist or dental hygienist to show you how to properly brush and floss your teeth. Your dentist may suggest devices to help remove plaque deposits. These include special toothpicks, toothbrushes, water irrigation, or other devices. You still must brush and floss your teeth regularly.Antiplaque or antitartar toothpastes or mouth rinses may also be recommended.Many dentists recommend having teeth professionally cleaned at least every 6 months. Some plaque can be missed, even with careful brushing and flossing at home. "}, "Gilbert's disease": {"description": "Gilbert's disease is a common disorder passed down through families. It affects the way bilirubin is processed by the liver, and causes the skin to take on a yellow color (jaundice).", "Possible Complications": "There are no known complications.", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes (mild jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "A blood test for bilirubin shows changes that occur with Gilbert's disease. The total bilirubin level is mildly elevated, with most being unconjugated bilirubin. Usually the total level is less than 2 mg/dL, and the conjugated bilirubin level is normal.Gilbert's disease is linked to a genetic problem, but genetic testing is not needed.", "Treatment": "No treatment is necessary for Gilbert's disease.", "Causes": "Gilbert's disease affects up 1 in 10 people in some Caucasian groups.", "Prevention": "There is no proven prevention."}, "Goiter - simple": {"description": "A simple goiter is an enlargement of the thyroid gland. It is usually not cancer.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulties (with very large goiters), especially when lying on the back", "Cough", "Hoarseness", "Swallowing difficulties, especially with solid food"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam. This involves feeling your neck as you swallow. Swelling in the area of the thyroid may be felt.If you have a very large goiter,\u00a0you may have\u00a0swelling in your neck vein. As a result, when the doctor asks you to raise your arms above your head, you may feel dizzy.Blood tests may be ordered to measure thyroid function:Free thyroxine (T4), Thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH). Tests to look for abnormal and possibly cancerous\u00a0areas in the thyroid gland include:Thyroid scan and uptake, Ultrasound of the thyroid. If nodules are found on an\u00a0ultrasound, a biopsy\u00a0may be needed\u00a0to check for thyroid cancer.", "Causes": "There are different kinds of goiters: A simple goiter can occur without a known reason. It can occur when the thyroid gland is not able to make enough thyroid hormone to meet the body's needs.\u00a0 This can be due to a lack of iodine in a person's diet. To make up for the shortage of thyroid hormone, the thyroid gland grows larger., Toxic nodular goiter is\u00a0an enlarged thyroid gland that\u00a0has a small, rounded growth or many growths called nodules. One or more of these nodules produce too much thyroid hormone. . The body needs iodine to produce thyroid hormone:Simple goiters may\u00a0occur in people who live in areas\u00a0where the soil and water do not have enough iodine. People in these\u00a0areas might not get enough iodine in their diet., The use of iodized salt in many food products in the United States prevents a lack of iodine in the diet. . In many cases of simple goiter, the cause is unknown. Other than a lack of iodine, other factors that may lead to the condition include:Certain medicines (lithium, amiodarone), Infections, Cigarette smoking, Certain foods (soy, peanuts, vegetables in the\u00a0broccoli and cabbage family) . Simple goiters are also more common in:Persons over age\u00a040, People with a family history of goiter, Women. ", "Prevention": "Using iodized table salt prevents most simple goiters.", "Treatment": "A goiter only needs to be treated if it is causing symptoms.Treatments for an enlarged thyroid include:Thyroid hormone replacement pills, if the goiter is due to an underactive thyroid, Small doses of Lugol's iodine or potassium iodine solution if the goiter is due to a lack of iodine, Radioactive iodine to shrink the gland,\u00a0especially if the thyroid is producing too much thyroid hormone, Surgery (thyroidectomy) to remove all or part of the gland. "}}